Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1396.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102(q.1) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words, when used in this act, shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context:* * *(q.1) The word "pre-canvass" shall mean the inspection and opening of all envelopes containing official absentee ballots or mail-in ballots, the removal of such ballots from the envelopes and [the counting, computing and tallying of the votes reflected on the ballots.] the preparation of those ballots for scanning, including unfolding, straightening and duplicating if the ballot is damaged in some way that prevents it from being scanned but 20250HB1396PN1688 - 2 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031323334353637383940414243 where the voter's intent is still clear. It shall also include scanning the ballot into a voting machine or other automatic tabulating device, if the equipment used by the county board of elections permits a ballot to be scanned without tabulating or counting the votes on the ballot scanned. The term does not include the examination of unopened absentee or mail-in ballot envelopes for processing, detecting voter errors or recording or publishing of the votes reflected on the ballots.* * *(z.7) The words "ballot drop box" shall mean a secure receptacle established by a county board of elections or county election official by which a voted absentee ballot or mail-in ballot may be deposited by hand by the qualified elector, or an authorized third party.(z.8) The words "photo identification" shall include an electronic or digital representation of a photo identification of an individual issued by a system maintained by the Commonwealth or an agency, county, municipality, school district or institution of higher education of this Commonwealth, displayed on a smartphone or other electronic device.Section 2. Section 412.2(a) and Article V heading of the act are amended to read:Section 412.2. Compensation of District Election Officers.--(a) In all counties regardless of class, judges of election, inspectors of election, clerks and machine operators shall be paid compensation as fixed by the county board of elections for each election, which amount shall be at least [$75 and not more than $200] $175.* * *ARTICLE V20250HB1396PN1688 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Election Districts [and], Polling Places and Ballot Drop BoxesSection 3. Article V of the act is amended by adding a subarticle to read:(b.1) Ballot Drop BoxesSection 531.1. Ballot drop box locations to be selected by county board of elections.(a) County board duties.-- (1) The county board of elections shall select and fix the ballot drop box locations within the county for each election and may, after notifying the secretary and for emergency purposes only, change the ballot drop box locations within the county.(2) The county board of elections shall inform the secretary of the ballot drop box locations at least 65 days prior to the primary election, municipal election or general election.(3) The county board of elections shall publicly announce, not less than 55 days prior to any primary election, municipal election or general election, by posting at its office in a conspicuous place and prominently featured on the county's publicly accessible Internet website, a list of the ballot drop box locations within the county. The list must include the address, dates and hours of operation of the ballot drop boxes, ballot return deadline, contact information for the county board of elections and accessibility information. The list shall be available for public inspection at an office of the county board of elections.(4) For a special election not being held during a primary election, municipal election or general election : 20250HB1396PN1688 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) the county board of elections shall inform the secretary of the ballot drop box locations no later than 10 days after the date a writ of election is issued; and(ii) the county board of elections shall publicly announce, no later than 20 days after the date a writ of election is issued by posting at its office in a conspicuous place and prominently featured on the county's publicly accessible Internet website, a list of the ballot drop box locations within the county. The list must include the address, dates and hours of operation of the ballot drop boxes, ballot return deadline, contact information for the county board of elections and accessibility information. The list must be available for public inspection at an office of the county board of elections.(5) If an additional ballot drop box is added, or a ballot drop box is moved for an emergency, the county board of elections must notify the secretary immediately and simultaneously update the county's publicly accessible Internet website with the new locations.(6) A county board of elections shall immediately forward to the correct county board of elections any out-of-county absentee ballots and mail-in ballots deposited in the county board of elections' ballot drop box. County boards of election shall accept receipt of absentee ballots and mail-in ballots from other county boards of election up until 8:00 p.m. on election day.(b) Minimum ballot drop box requirement.-- (1) Each county must provide at least two ballot drop boxes within the county for each primary election, special 20250HB1396PN1688 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 election, municipal election or general election. The ballot drop boxes must be arrayed throughout the county. The county board of elections may add additional ballot drop boxes. Nothing in this section shall limit counties to only two ballot drop boxes if the county board of elections deems additional ballot drop boxes are appropriate.(2) In addition to the ballot drop boxes required under paragraph (1), the county board of elections in a county with a population over 100,000 must provide additional ballot drop boxes equal to at least one additional ballot drop box for every 50,000 registered voters over 100,000 as determined on the date of the November election of the preceding year.(c) Prohibition.--A county or municipality may not prohibit or inhibit the use of ballot drop boxes.Section 531.2. Signage, hours of operation and security.(a) Label.--Each ballot drop box must be labeled "Official Ballot Drop Box" and must include the following:(1) Specific points identifying the slot where ballots are to be inserted. A ballot drop box may have more than one ballot slot.(2) Language stating counterfeiting, forging, tampering with or destroying ballots is a second-degree misdemeanor under sections 1816, 1817 and 1827.(3) A statement that third-party return of a ballot is prohibited unless the individual returning the ballot:(i) is rendering assistance to a disabled voter or an emergency absentee voter as authorized by law;(ii) is a member of the same household as the voter; (iii) is the voter's parent, grandparent or adult child; or20250HB1396PN1688 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) is a caregiver.(4) A statement requesting that the designated county elections official shall be notified immediately if the ballot drop box is full, not functioning or is damaged, including a telephone number and email address for the designated county elections official.(5) Signage that states "You are returning your ballot to (name of county) County. If you are registered to vote in another county, your ballot will be forwarded but will not be considered timely received unless and until it's received by your county of registration by 8:00 p.m. on election day" or substantially similar language.(b) Surveillance and security.-- Except for ballot drop boxes provided under section 531.1(e), while WHILE available, the ballot drop box shall be under video surveillance, securely fastened to a stationary surface or an immovable object for the duration of its deployment during an election. The ballot drop box must be constructed to securely receive and hold the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots and have a unique identifying number. The ballot drop box shall be secured by a lock and shall include a tamper-evident seal. Only the county board of elections, a county election official or an individual designated by the county board of elections shall have access to the means to unfasten the lock.(c) Duties of secretary.--The secretary shall develop standards and issue appropriate directives for additional security measures at ballot drop box locations.(d) Access.--Ballot drop boxes must be made available for use by voters at least 30 days before the next occurring primary election, special election, municipal election or general 20250HB1396PN1688 - 7 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 election. At least one ballot drop box per county must be made available 24 hours a day for use by voters.Section 531.3. Removal of absentee ballots and mail-in ballots. (a) Ballot removal.--Absentee and mail-in ballots must be removed from each ballot drop box at least once every day by at least two individuals. Both individuals must be a county election official or an individual designated by the county board of elections. Each individual removing ballots from any ballot drop box shall carry proper identification.(b) Collection and chain of custody requirement.--Conforming with the requirements of this section and any other directives of the secretary, each county board of elections shall utilize ballot collection and chain of custody procedures. The department shall create a paper or electronic form, entitled the Ballot Drop Box Collection Form, to be used when retrieving absentee ballots and mail-in ballots from the ballot drop boxes.(c) Form required.--A Ballot Drop Box Collection Form must be completed by the county election officials and individuals designated by the county board of elections each time they remove absentee ballots and mail-in ballots from a ballot drop box and return absentee ballots and mail-in ballots to the county board of elections in a secured transport container. A Ballot Drop Box Collection Form must include the following information:(1) The ballot drop box location and the unique identifying number of the ballot drop box.(2) The date and time ballots were emptied from the ballot drop box.(3) The names of the individuals removing the ballots from the ballot drop box and the name of the individual who 20250HB1396PN1688 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 secured and relocked the ballot drop box.(4) The name of the county election official or designee receiving the secured transport container.(5) The date and time the county election official or designee received the secured transport container.(6) The number of ballots delivered in the secured transport container.(d) Transportation and security.--Absentee ballots and mail- in ballots from ballot drop boxes must be returned to the county board of elections in secured transport containers and immediately taken to a secure location established by the county board of elections to be held until ballots are pre-canvassed under this act. A county election official or individual designated by the county board of elections shall take control of the secured transport container and inspect the container for tampering. The county election official or individual designated by the county board of elections receiving the ballots shall complete the Ballot Drop Box Collection Form.(e) Interference prohibited.--An individual may not interfere with the emptying of ballot drop boxes. An individual who interferes with the removal of ballots from a ballot drop box or inhibits or prevents a voter or authorized agent from lawfully depositing a ballot commits a criminal offense under section 1849.Section 3.1. Section 1101-A of the act is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1101-A. Definitions.--As used in this article:* * *"Ballot set" means one of any number of ballot types each used for a particular method of voting, including absentee 20250HB1396PN1688 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ballot voting, mail-in ballot voting, voting in-person at a polling place and voting by emergency paper ballot."Ballot style" means a ballot's particular array of election contests and candidates specific to an election district. Each ballot set shall comprise ballots with various ballot styles.* * *Section 3.2. Section 1110-A(d) and (e) of the act are amended to read:Section 1110-A. Supplies; Preparation of the Voting System and of Polling Places.--* * *[(d) On or before the fortieth day preceding any election, the county board of elections shall mail to the chairman of the county committee of each political party which shall be entitled under existing laws to participate in primary elections within the county, and to the chairman or presiding officer of any organization of citizens within the county which has as its purpose or among its purposes the investigation or prosecution of election frauds and which has registered its name and address and the names of its principal officers with the county board of elections at least fifty days before the election, a written notice stating the times when and the place or places where preparation of the system and its components for use in the several election districts in the county or municipality will be started. One representative of each such political party, certified by the respective chairman of the county committee of such party, and one representative of each such organization of citizens, certified by the respective chairman or presiding officer of such organization shall be entitled to be present during the preparation of the voting system and its components and to see that they are properly prepared and are in proper 20250HB1396PN1688 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 condition and order for use. Such representatives shall not interfere with the preparation of the system and its components, and the county board may make reasonable rules and regulations governing the conduct of such representatives.(e) Prior to the delivery of any automatic tabulating equipment to any election district the county board of elections shall examine or cause to have examined such equipment and shall make a certificate stating:(1) the identifying number and election district designation of the equipment;(2) that the equipment is suitable for use in the particular election district designated;(3) that the equipment has been tested to ascertain that it will accurately compute the votes cast for all offices and all questions;(4) that the offices and questions on the official ballot correspond in all respects with the ballot labels assigned to such particular election district;(5) that the public counter and the counters for each candidate position and each question are all set at zero and that element that generates a printed record of the results of the election is functioning correctly; and(6) the number on the seal with which the equipment is sealed.]* * *Section 3.3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1110.1-A. Pre-Election Logic and Accuracy Testing.--(a) Prior to an election in which an electronic voting system is to be used, the county board of elections shall complete logic and accuracy testing for the electronic voting system in 20250HB1396PN1688 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with this section to ensure that voting equipment functions as expected and votes are accurately tabulated.(b) Logic and accuracy testing shall be sufficient to determine that:(1) The electronic voting system is properly programmed.(2) The election is correctly defined on the electronic voting system.(3) All of the input, output and communication devices for the electronic voting system are working properly.(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), logic and accuracy testing shall be completed as soon as ballots are available.(2) If a proceeding is pending in a Federal or State court that would affect the contents of a ballot, logic and accuracy testing shall be completed no later than the eleventh day prior to the election.(d) During logic and accuracy testing, the county board of elections shall:(1) For each voting device that will or may be used in the upcoming election:(i) Generate a report that shows the contest order and confirm that the contest order as reported matches the expected contest order.(ii) Mark, in all available languages using the touchscreen and any other assistive device provided by the manufacturer, and print ballots for each ballot style using a predetermined voting pattern designed such that each contest, and each choice within each contest, is given a unique number of votes.(iii) Review the printed ballots to ensure that the ballots were accurately printed and the votes contained on the printed 20250HB1396PN1688 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ballot match the choices designated by the tester.(iv) Scan the printed ballots to ensure that the ballots will scan and generate the expected results.(v) Shut down, lock and seal the voting device.(vi) Execute a written statement specifying:(A) The electronic voting devices tested.(B) The results of the testing.(C) The protective counter numbers, if applicable, of each tabulation device.(D) The number of the seal securing each tabulation device at the conclusion of testing.(E) Any problems reported to the county board of elections as a result of the testing.(F) The identifying number and election district designation of the device.(G) Whether each device tested is satisfactory or unsatisfactory.(2) For each piece of automatic tabulating equipment that will or may be used in the upcoming election:(i) Generate a report that shows the total number of votes for all contests and candidates and confirm that the totals show as zero for all contests and candidates.(ii) Scan premarked ballots for each ballot style using a predetermined voting pattern designed such that each contest, and each choice within each contest, is given a unique number of votes.(iii) Generate a report that shows the vote totals for each contest and candidate and compare the reported results to the expected results to ensure that the automatic tabulating equipment will generate the expected results.20250HB1396PN1688 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Reset all vote totals, shut down, lock and seal the automated tabulating equipment.(v) Execute a written statement specifying:(A) The automatic tabulation equipment tested.(B) The results of the testing.(C) The protective counter numbers, if applicable, of each tabulation device.(D) The number of the seal securing each tabulation device at the conclusion of testing.(E) Any problems reported to the county board of elections as a result of the testing.(F) Whether each device tested is satisfactory or unsatisfactory.(e) The Secretary of the Commonwealth may:(1) Prescribe additional requirements relating to logic and accuracy testing as the Secretary of the Commonwealth deems appropriate.(2) Issue directives and instructions for the implementation and administration of this section, but only if the directives and instructions do not conflict with the requirements of this section.(f) No later than forty-eight hours prior to beginning logic and accuracy testing, the county board of elections shall give notice of the times and places in which the logic and accuracy testing will be conducted as follows:(1) The county board of elections shall mail the notice to:(i) The chairperson of the county committee of each political party that is entitled to participate in primary elections within the county.(ii) The chairperson or presiding officer of each 20250HB1396PN1688 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 organization within the county whose purpose includes the investigation or prosecution of election frauds and that has registered its name and address and the names of its principal officers with the county board of elections by the first Monday in February of the year.(2) The county board of elections shall post the notice on its publicly accessible Internet website.(3) The county board of elections shall publish the notice in accordance with section 106, with the notice to be published once.(g) The county board of elections shall allow in-person observation of logic and accuracy testing in accordance with the following procedures:(1) One representative from each political party whose chairperson is entitled to receive notice under subsection (f)(1)(i) may observe the logic and accuracy testing, if the representative is certified by the chairperson of the county committee of the party.(2) One representative of each organization entitled to receive notice under subsection (f)(1)(ii) may observe the logic and accuracy testing if the representative is certified by the chairperson or presiding officer of the organization.(3) A registered elector of the county who gives the county board of elections at least twenty-four hours' notice may observe the logic and accuracy testing.(4) A representative or a registered elector who observes the logic and accuracy testing may not interfere with the testing.(5) The county board of elections may make reasonable rules and regulations governing the conduct of the representatives and 20250HB1396PN1688 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registered electors during the logic and accuracy testing. The rules and regulations must be published as part of the notice required under subsection (f).(h) No later than five days after completing logic and accuracy testing, the county board of elections shall certify compliance with the requirements of this section to the Secretary of the Commonwealth in a manner and on a form as prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The Department of State shall post each certification received by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under this subsection to its publicly accessible Internet website.(i) If the county board of elections fails to comply with this section or with any directive or instruction issued by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under this section, the following shall apply:(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the failure shall not constitute competent evidence in any administrative, legislative or judicial proceeding, including any petition for recount under section 1404(e), 1701, 1702 or 1703.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Secretary of the Commonwealth may bring an action to enforce this section and may introduce as evidence the failure of the county board of elections to comply with this section or any directive or instruction issued by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under this section.(3) The failure shall not be cause or justification for delaying or refusing to perform any duty assigned under this act, including the county board of elections' duty to receive, canvass, compute or certify the returns of each election under section 302(k).20250HB1396PN1688 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Section 1117-A of the act is repealed:[Section 1117-A. Statistical Sample.--The county board of elections, as part of the computation and canvass of returns, shall conduct a statistical recount of a random sample of ballots after each election using manual, mechanical or electronic devices of a type different than those used for the specific election. The sample shall include at least two (2) per centum of the votes cast or two thousand (2,000) votes whichever is the lesser.]Section 5. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1117.1-A. Post-Election Ballot Audit.--(a) After each regularly scheduled primary and general NOVEMBER election, each county board of elections shall participate in a bipartisan post-election ballot audit in accordance with the following:(1) The audit shall include a review of a random sample of paper ballots cast in one or more selected Statewide or county contests.(2) The audit shall be facilitated by the department.(3) The audit shall include the contested race at the top of the ballot and, if existing, an additional Statewide contest to be randomly selected by the department. The following are not eligible for selection:(i) An uncontested race.(ii) A race for which a full recount has been ordered.(4) The department shall identify, approve and employ an audit method that provides a high statistical confidence that the election outcome in each audited Statewide OR COUNTY contest is correct. All department-approved audit methods shall be consistent with best practices in the field, including methods approved by the National Academies of Sciences and the American 20250HB1396PN1688 - 17 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Statistical Association.(5) The department shall direct and oversee the process to randomly select the ballots necessary to confirm the accuracy of the election outcome for the Statewide races, based on the statistical methods and on the margin between the winning and the losing candidate or measure.(6) As soon as practicable following the completion of the audit, the department shall publish detailed audit data that allows the public to verify the random sample, audit calculations and audit results THE FINAL RESULT OF THE AUDIT ON ITS PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ALSO, WITHIN ONE BUSINESS DAY OF SELECTING THE RANDOM SEED AND LIST OF AUDITED CONTESTS, PUBLISH THE FOLLOWING on its publicly accessible Internet website . : (I) RANDOM SEED;(II) LIST OF AUDITED CONTESTS;(III) COUNTY BALLOT MANIFESTS; AND(IV) CANDIDATE VOTE TOTALS BY BATCH SELECTED FOR THE POST-ELECTION BALLOT AUDIT.No data published may reveal the contents of any ballot.(7) The department and each county WITH BALLOTS SELECTED IN THE RANDOM SAMPLE shall provide public notice in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings) of the time and place of the audit processes. The audit shall be conducted in public view to permit observation and within feasible election operations. The county board may establish reasonable restrictions to prevent members of the public from interfering with the audit process. A member of the public may not:(i) Touch ballots or other official materials.(ii) In any way impede the process.20250HB1396PN1688 - 18 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) The audit:(i) Shall take into account all forms of validly cast ballots, including in-person, absentee, mail-in and provisional ballots.(ii) May include hand-marked, ballot marking device-marked and disability tool-marked ballots.(9) Each official participating in the audit shall swear or affirm that the participant will support, obey and defend the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Pennsylvania and that the participant will discharge the duties of the audit with fidelity.(10) Each official participating in the audit shall ensure that each ballot examined during the audit is protected from loss, substitution, alteration or addition.(11) The department shall provide any necessary instructions, software and other materials to the county boards to carry out these audits.(12) The secretary shall promulgate rules, regulations and procedures as necessary to implement this section.(13) The audit process and oversight, including ballot review and reporting of votes, shall be conducted by teams of no less than two officials and no greater than three officials representing a partisan balance which shall include the two principal political parties, and may include additional unaffiliated voters. Each audit team member shall be appointed by the county board of elections from a pool of competent persons who are qualified registered electors of the county and who meet the above criteria. Any audit team vacancy occurring at any time preceding or on the day of the audit shall be filled by appointment by the county board of elections according to the 20250HB1396PN1688 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 above criteria.(b) The following shall apply:(1) The post-election ballot audits must be completed during the official canvass before a county board finalizes the certification of official election returns before the third Monday after the primary or general election.(2) The secretary may extend the county certification deadline if the extension:(i) is necessary to complete the audit; and(ii) does not impair other deadlines.(3) If the results of the audit confirm to a high degree of statistical confidence that the originally reported contest outcome was correct, the contests shall be certified by the county and the secretary.(4) If the initial audit result fails to confirm to a high degree of statistical confidence that the originally reported contest outcome was correct, the following shall apply:(i) Within forty-eight (48) hours, the secretary shall direct relevant counties to commence appropriate action to confirm or determine the outcome.(ii) The action may include further investigation or expanding the size and scope of the ballot sample, including, if necessary, a full recount of all ballots cast for the audited contest.(5) If the official results of a full recount conclude a different outcome than the originally reported results, the winner determined by the full recount shall replace the originally reported winner and the county and the secretary shall certify the results as determined by the full recount.(c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases 20250HB1396PN1688 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department" shall mean the Department of State of the Commonwealth."Paper ballot" shall mean the original of all forms of validly cast and counted ballots, including qualified in-person, absentee, mail-in and provisional ballots, and may include hand marked, ballot marking device-marked and disability tool-marked ballots."Post-election ballot audit" shall mean a post-election process that involves MANUAL inspection of a random sample of paper ballots IN THE SELECTED COUNTIES to verify votes cast in one or more selected contests FOR AUDIT , as determined and facilitated by the department. A POST-ELECTION AUDIT IS A DISTINCT PROCESS FROM A RECOUNT."Secretary" shall mean the Secretary of the Commonwealth.Section 6. The act is amended by adding articles to read:ARTICLE XI-CELECTRONIC POLL BOOKSSection 1101-C. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The county board of elections."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Electronic poll books." A secure and self-contained electronic record system examined, approved and certified by the secretary, constituting the voters' certificates, voting check list, numbered lists of voters, district register and general register for the county that:20250HB1396PN1688 - 21 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) has the ability to enable a poll worker to perform by electronic means each of the same functions performed using a paper district register during an election;(2) receives and stores electronically the name, address, date of birth, identifying municipality, particular election district from which the voter is registered, signature of voters and any other necessary voter information;(3) securely downloads and uploads voter information in concert with the SURE system;(4) contains information regarding whether a registered voter already voted in the particular election, requested an absentee or mail-in ballot or returned an absentee or mail-in ballot;(5) allows real-time transmission of information to and from SURE and other electronic poll books regarding updates to voter registration and voter history records.(6) if used at a polling place on election day, redirects an in-person voter to their correct polling place;(7) provides an auditable record of the district register for a particular election; and(8) has any other capability or standard deemed appropriate by the secretary."Secretary." The Secretary of the Commonwealth."SURE system." The Statewide Uniform Registry of Electors established under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1222 (relating to SURE system).Section 1102-C. Use. (a) Standards.--Each board shall use electronic poll books that meet the minimum standards published by the secretary under section 1103-C in all early voting locations and precincts on 20250HB1396PN1688 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 election day for each primary and election held after December 31, 2026. Electronic poll books shall serve as the district register and shall be used as all of the following in each voting location allowed for by law in this Commonwealth:(1) Voters' certificates.(2) Voting check lists.(3) Numbered lists of voters.(4) District registers.(5) For the management of district registers during elections.(6) Any other use deemed appropriate by the secretary.(b) Poll book standards.--An electronic poll book may not be used by a county board of elections unless it meets the standards established and published by the secretary under section 1103-C and is examined, approved and certified in accordance with the secretary's directive. The secretary shall have the authority to decertify and prohibit from use any electronic poll book that at any point does not meet the standards under this section or as set forth in the secretary's directive.Section 1103-C. Standards.(a) General.--The secretary, in coordination with the Office of Administration and Office of Information Technology, shall, upon request by a commercial electronic poll book vendor or county board of elections, examine commercially available electronic poll books and, upon successful completion of the examination, approve examined poll books for use. The secretary shall issue a directive establishing requirements and specifications which shall define the minimum standards required, capabilities and security requirements of electronic 20250HB1396PN1688 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 poll books for certification by the secretary. The requirements and specifications shall include compatibility with the SURE system, screen size, technology documentation, user safety, accessibility, durability, device and system security standards, data encryption, audit log, data and power backup, signature capture requirements, voter data fields and any other requirements identified as necessary to meet the needs for each voting location allowed by law in this Commonwealth. The secretary, in issuing such directive, shall take appropriate measures to protect against the disclosure of sensitive information relating to security and infrastructure.(b) Compatibility.--To have compatibility with the SURE system, an electronic poll book must include the ability to import the records of each registered voter in the election district and county and update those records before election day, to record edits to the records on election day, and to export to the SURE system each of the election activity and voter participation information that occurs each day and the capability to generate a report of all election activity and participation information for manual entry into the SURE system.(c) Prohibited interest.--The secretary, the department staff involved with implementation, maintenance or upkeep of the SURE system or electronic poll books or any member of a board may not hold a pecuniary interest in an electronic poll book company, components of an electronic poll book or in the design, manufacture or sale of an electronic poll book.(d) Access to poll books.--The county board shall secure each electronic poll book and prohibit third-party access not authorized by the secretary. The secretary shall develop standards and issue a directive for secure storage of electronic 20250HB1396PN1688 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 poll books during and at any time before or after an election. Failure of a county board or election worker to comply with the secretary's directive may result in a decertification or decommissioning of the county's electronic poll books and fines as prescribed by the secretary.(e) Standards and requirements.--The secretary shall develop standards and requirements for a board to ensure that a paper version of the district register and all necessary documents, including numbered list of voters, are available at a polling place on election day and can be updated in the event of a failure of or inability to use an electronic poll book.Section 1104-C. Funding for acquisition. (a) Declaration of policy.--The General Assembly finds and declares that funding of the acquisition of electronic poll books for the management of voter data for each polling place in this Commonwealth is in the best interest of this Commonwealth.(b) Appropriation.--The General Assembly appropriates $2,000,000 from the General Fund to the department for the examination and approval of commercially available electronic poll books that shall be compatible with the SURE system and for the development and implementation of a secure electronic poll book network to be used by counties.ARTICLE XI-DELECTRONIC POLL BOOKS ANDELECTION INFRASTRUCTURE EQUIPMENT BONDSSection 1101-D. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The County Electronic Poll Book and Election 20250HB1396PN1688 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Infrastructure Equipment Reimbursement Account established under section 1106-D."Authority." The Pennsylvania Economic Development Financing Authority."Bond." Any type of revenue obligation, including a bond or series of bonds, note, certificate or other instrument, issued by the authority for the benefit of the department under this article."Bond administrative expenses." Expenses incurred to administer bonds as provided under the Financing Law, or as necessary to ensure compliance with Federal or State law."Bond obligations." The principal of a bond and any premium and interest payable on a bond, together with any amount owed under a related credit agreement or a related resolution of the authority authorizing a bond."Credit agreement." A loan agreement, a revolving credit agreement, an agreement establishing a line of credit, a letter of credit or another agreement that enhances the marketability, security or creditworthiness of a bond."Department." The Department of State of the Commonwealth."Election infrastructure equipment." The following apply:(1) Hardware or software, or both, that is used by a county in running elections. The term includes, but is not limited to:(i) mail-ballot processing equipment, such as envelope openers; and(ii) information technology equipment, such as:(A) broadband, Internet or cellular infrastructure; or(B) intrusion detection sensors, deployed to 20250HB1396PN1688 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enhance the security of electronic voting systems, electronic poll books and other election systems by detecting and reporting hacking attempts and other election security breaches.(2) The term does not include electronic voting systems or electronic poll books."Electronic poll book." The components of electronic poll books as defined in section 1101-C."Electronic voting system." As defined in section 1101-A."Financing Law." The act of August 23, 1967 (P.L.251, No.102), known as the Economic Development Financing Law.Section 1102-D. Bond issuance. (a) Declaration of policy.--The General Assembly finds and declares that funding for electronic poll books and election infrastructure equipment, including interest, through the authority, is in the best interest of this Commonwealth.(b) Authority.--Notwithstanding any other law, the following shall apply:(1) The department may be a project applicant under the Financing Law and may apply to the authority for the funding of electronic poll books and election infrastructure equipment.(2) The authority may issue bonds under the Financing Law, consistent with this article, to finance a project or projects consisting of funding the purchase, replacement or lease of electronic poll books by the counties, the reimbursement to the counties for their cost to purchase or lease electronic poll books and for the purchase or lease of election infrastructure equipment by the counties.(3) Participation of an industrial and commercial 20250HB1396PN1688 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development authority shall not be required to finance the projects or to issue the bonds described under this article.(c) Debt or liability.--(1) Bonds issued under this article shall not be a debt or liability of the Commonwealth and shall not create or constitute an indebtedness, liability or obligation of the Commonwealth.(2) Bond obligations and bond administrative expenses shall be payable solely from revenues or money pledged or available for repayment as authorized under this article. This paragraph shall include the proceeds of any issuance of bonds.(3) Each bond shall contain on the bond's face a statement that:(i) the authority is obligated to pay the principal or interest on the bonds only from the revenues or money pledged or available for repayment as authorized under this article;(ii) neither the Commonwealth nor a county is obligated to pay the principal or interest; and(iii) the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth or any county is not pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds.Section 1103-D. Criteria for bond issuance. (a) Application.--(1) The department shall apply to the authority to issue bonds to provide financing to the department to:(i) reimburse each county for the county's cost to purchase or lease electronic poll books;(ii) fund a county's purchase or lease of electronic 20250HB1396PN1688 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 poll books; or(iii) fund the purchase or lease of election infrastructure equipment.(2) The choice of the funding options under paragraph (1)(i) or (ii) and the choice of type of electronic poll books shall be at the discretion of the Secretary of the Commonwealth.(b) Issuance.--Bonds may be issued in one or more series, and each series may finance reimbursement grants to one or more counties.(c) Terms.--(1) The department, with the approval of the Office of the Budget, shall specify in its application to the authority:(i) the maximum principal amount of the bonds for each bond issue; and(ii) the maximum term of the bonds consistent with applicable law.(2) The total principal amount for all bonds, not including refunding bonds, issued under this article may not exceed $60,000,000.(3) The term of the bonds issued under this article may not exceed 10 years from the respective date of original issuance.(d) Expiration.--For the purpose of this article, the authorization to issue bonds, except for the authorization to issue refunding bonds, shall expire December 31, 2027.Section 1104-D. Issuance of bonds and sources of payments. (a) Issuance.--The authority shall consider issuing the bonds upon application by the department. Bonds issued under 20250HB1396PN1688 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this article shall be subject to the provisions of the Financing Law, unless otherwise specified under this article.(b) Service agreement authorized.--The authority and the department may enter into an agreement or service agreement to effectuate this article, including an agreement to secure bonds issued for the purposes under section 1102-D(b), pursuant to which the department shall agree to pay the bond obligations and bond administrative expenses to the authority in each fiscal year that the bonds or refunding bonds are outstanding in amounts sufficient to timely pay in full the bond obligations, bond administrative expenses and any other financing costs due on the bonds issued for the purposes under section 1102-D(b). The department's payment of the bond obligations, bond administrative expenses and other financing costs due on the bonds as service charges under an agreement or service agreement shall be subject to and dependent upon the appropriation of funds by the General Assembly to the department for payment of the service charges. The service agreement may be amended or supplemented by the authority and the department in connection with the issuance of any series of bonds or refunding bonds authorized under this article.Section 1105-D. Sale of bonds. The authority shall offer the bonds for sale by means of a public, competitive sale or by means of a negotiated sale based on the authority's determination of which method will produce the most benefit to counties and the Commonwealth.Section 1106-D. Deposit of bond proceeds. The net proceeds of bonds, other than refunding bonds, exclusive of costs of issuance, reserves and any other financing charges, shall be transferred by the authority to the State 20250HB1396PN1688 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Treasurer for deposit into a restricted account established in the State Treasury and held solely for the purposes under section 1102-D(b) to be known as the County Electronic Poll Book and Election Infrastructure Equipment Reimbursement Account. The department shall pay out the bond proceeds to the counties from the account in accordance with this article.Section 1107-D. Payment of bond-related obligations. For each fiscal year in which bond obligations and bond administrative expenses will be due, the authority shall notify the department of the amount of bond obligations and the estimated amount of bond administrative expenses in sufficient time, as determined by the department, to permit the department to request an appropriation sufficient to pay bond obligations and bond administrative expenses that will be due and payable in the following fiscal year. The authority's calculation of the amount of bond obligations and bond administrative expenses that will be due shall be subject to verification by the department.Section 1108-D. Commonwealth not to impair bond-related obligations.The Commonwealth pledges that it shall not do any of the following:(1) Limit or alter the rights and responsibilities of the authority or the department under this article, including the responsibility to:(i) pay bond obligations and bond administrative expenses; and(ii) comply with any other instrument or agreement pertaining to bonds.(2) Alter or limit the service agreement under section 1104-D(b).20250HB1396PN1688 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Impair the rights and remedies of the holders of bonds, until each bond issued and the interest on the bond are fully met and discharged.Section 1109-D. Personal liability.The members, directors, officers and employees of the department and the authority shall not be personally liable as a result of good faith exercise of the rights and responsibilities granted under this article.Section 1110-D. Annual report.No later than March 1 of the year following the first full year in which bonds have been issued under this article and for each year thereafter in which bond obligations existed in the prior year, the department shall submit an annual report to the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of the State Government Committee of the House of Representatives and publish the report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website providing all data available on bonds issued or existing in the prior year. The report shall include existing and anticipated bond principal, interest and administrative costs, revenue, repayments, refinancing, overall benefits to counties and any other relevant data, facts and statistics that the department believes necessary in the content of the report.Section 1111-D. County electronic poll book and election infrastructure expenses.(a) Application.--(1) A county may apply to the department to receive 20250HB1396PN1688 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 funding or reimbursement for:(i) the purchase or lease of electronic poll books; and(ii) the purchase or lease of election infrastructure equipment.(2) Each county shall apply for funding on a form containing information and documentation prescribed by the department no later than July 1, 2026. The department may allow a county to submit one or more applications.(b) Documentation for prior purchase or lease.--If a county seeks reimbursement of the county's cost to purchase or lease by capital lease electronic poll books or election infrastructure equipment that the county purchased or leased before the date that the county submits its application to the department, the county's application shall include documentation prescribed by the department to substantiate the county's cost to purchase or lease the electronic poll books or election infrastructure equipment, including copies of fully executed electronic poll book contracts, fully executed copies of election infrastructure equipment contracts, invoices and proof of payment to the vendor of the electronic poll book or election infrastructure equipment.(c) Documentation for subsequent purchase or lease.--If a county seeks funding to purchase or lease electronic poll books or election infrastructure equipment that the county will purchase or lease after the date that the county submits its application to the department, the county's application shall include documentation prescribed by the department to substantiate the county's estimate to purchase or lease the electronic poll books or election infrastructure equipment, 20250HB1396PN1688 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including copies of fully executed electronic poll book contracts or election infrastructure equipment bids or price quotes submitted to the county and other price estimates or cost proposals.(d) Review.--The department shall review each county's application on a rolling basis and shall either approve or deny each county's application within 90 days of the date the application is received by the department. A county may supplement or amend submitted applications during the 90-day review period in consultation with the department.(e) Approval for prior purchase or lease.--If the department approves a county's application submitted under subsection (b), the department and the county shall enter into a written grant agreement through which the department shall reimburse the county at the amount determined under subsection (g).(f) Approval for subsequent purchase or lease.--If the department approves a county's application submitted under subsection (c), the department and the county shall enter into a written grant agreement through which the department shall provide funding to the county to purchase or lease electronic poll books or election infrastructure equipment at the amount determined under subsection (g). The county shall hold the grant money in an account of the county that is separate from each other county account. The county shall deliver quarterly reports to the department of the electronic poll book costs or election infrastructure equipment costs paid from the grant money in a form prescribed by the department. The county shall return any unspent grant money to the department within 30 days of the expiration of the grant agreement.(g) Payments.--20250HB1396PN1688 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A county shall only receive amounts under this section to the extent that the department has bond proceeds available in the account from which to make payments.(2) Except as provided under paragraph (3), a county which submitted an application approved under subsection (e) or (f) may receive 100% of the total amount submitted under subsection (b) or (c) which may be reimbursed or paid.(3) If the total amount submitted by all counties under paragraph (2) exceeds the total amount available for reimbursement or payment, a county may receive a portion of the amount available equal to the total amount submitted by the county under subsection (b) or (c) which may be reimbursed or paid, divided by the total amount submitted by all counties under subsection (b) or (c) which may be reimbursed or paid.Section 7. Sections 1210(a.4)(2), (5)(i), (ii) and (7) and (d) and 1231(b)(1), (3) and (4) of the act are amended to read:Section 1210. Manner of Applying to Vote; Persons Entitled to Vote; Voter's Certificates; Entries to Be Made in District Register; Numbered Lists of Voters; Challenges.--* * *(a.4) * * *(2) Prior to voting the provisional ballot, the elector shall be required to sign an affidavit stating the following:I do solemnly swear or affirm that my name is______________, that my date of birth is __________,and at the time that I registered I resided at __________ in the municipality of _________________ in _____________ County of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and that this is the only ballot that I cast in this election.Signature of Voter/Elector20250HB1396PN1688 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Current AddressCheck the Reason for Casting the Provisional Ballot.[Signed by Judge of Elections and minority inspector]* * *(5) (i) Except as provided in subclause (ii), if it is determined that the individual was registered and entitled to vote at the election district where the ballot was cast, the county board of elections shall compare the signature on the provisional ballot envelope with the signature on the elector's registration form and, if the signatures are determined to be genuine, shall count the ballot if the county board of elections confirms that the individual did not cast any other ballot, including an absentee ballot, in the election. Except as provided in subclause (ii), i f it is determined that the individual voting the provisional ballot was registered and eligible to vote in the Commonwealth but not at the election district where the ballot was cast, the county board of elections shall compare the signature on the provisional ballot envelope with the signature on the elector's registration form and, if the signatures are determined to be genuine, shall open the envelope and only count that portion of the ballot that the individual would have been eligible to vote in his proper election district.(ii) A provisional ballot shall not be counted if:(A) either the provisional ballot envelope under clause (3) or the affidavit under clause (2) is not signed by the individual;(B) the signature required under clause (3) and the signature required under clause (2) are either not genuine or are not executed by the same individual;20250HB1396PN1688 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [(C) a provisional ballot envelope does not contain a secrecy envelope;](D) in the case of a provisional ballot that was cast under subsection (a.2)(1)(i), within six calendar days following the election the elector fails to appear before the county board of elections to execute an affirmation or the county board of elections does not receive an electronic, facsimile or paper copy of an affirmation affirming, under penalty of perjury, that the elector is the same individual who personally appeared before the district election board on the day of the election and cast a provisional ballot and that the elector is indigent and unable to obtain proof of identification without the payment of a fee;(E) in the case of a provisional ballot that was cast under subsection (a.2)(1)(ii), within six calendar days following the election, the elector fails to appear before the county board of elections to present proof of identification and execute an affirmation or the county board of elections does not receive an electronic, facsimile or paper copy of the proof of identification and an affirmation affirming, under penalty of perjury, that the elector is the same individual who personally appeared before the district election board on the day of the election and cast a provisional ballot; or(F) the elector's absentee ballot or mail-in ballot is timely received by a county board of elections[.], unless the board determines that the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot will not be counted due to a reason unrelated to the elector's eligibility to vote in the election.* * *[(7) The following shall apply:20250HB1396PN1688 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Except as provided in subclause (ii), if it is determined that the individual voting the provisional ballot was eligible to vote in the county in which the ballot was cast but not at the election district where the ballot was cast, the county board of elections shall open the envelope and only count that portion of the ballot that the individual would have been eligible to vote in his proper election district and at the election district where the vote was cast if:(A) the county board of elections confirms that the individual did not cast any other ballot, including an absentee ballot, in the election; and(B) the individual casting the provisional ballot is a resident of the county in which the provisional ballot was cast.(ii) In the event that the individual casting the provisional ballot is not found to be a resident of the county in which the provisional ballot was cast, the ballot shall not be counted.(iii) In the event that the board of elections determines, based on an evidentiary record, that the individual intentionally and wilfully cast a provisional ballot in an election district in which the individual was not eligible to vote, the ballot shall not be counted.]* * *(d) No person, except a qualified elector who is in actual military or naval service under a requisition of the President of the United States or by the authority of this Commonwealth, and who votes under the provisions of Article XIII of this act, shall be entitled or permitted to vote at any primary or election at any polling place outside the election district in which he resides, nor shall he be permitted to vote in the 20250HB1396PN1688 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 election district in which he resides, unless he has been personally registered as an elector and his registration card appears in the district register of such election district, except by order of the court of common pleas as provided in this act[, and any person, although personally registered as an elector, may be challenged by any qualified elector, election officer, overseer, or watcher at any primary or election as to his identity, as to his continued residence in the election district or as to any alleged violation of the provisions of section 1210 of this act, and if challenged as to identity or residence, he shall produce at least one qualified elector of the election district as a witness, who shall make affidavit of his identity or continued residence in the election district]: Provided, however, That no person shall be entitled to vote as a member of a party at any primary, unless he is registered and enrolled as a member of such party upon the district register, which enrollment shall be conclusive as to his party membership and shall not be subject to challenge on the day of the primary.* * *Section 1231. Deadline for Receipt of Valid Voter Registration Application.--* * *(b) In the administration of voter registration, each commission shall ensure that an applicant who is a qualified elector is registered to vote in an election when the applicant has met any of the following conditions:(1) In the case of voter registration with a motor vehicle driver's license application under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1323 (relating to application with driver's license application), if the valid voter registration application is received by the [appropriate commission] Department of Transportation not later than fifteen 20250HB1396PN1688 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days before the election.* * *(3) In the case of voter registration at a voter registration agency under 25 Pa.C.S. § 1325 (relating to government agencies), if the valid voter registration application is received by the appropriate commission or the Department of State not later than fifteen days before the election.(4) In any other case, if the valid voter registration application of the applicant is received by the appropriate commission or the Department of State not later than fifteen days before the election.* * *Section 8. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XII-AIN-PERSON EARLY VOTINGSection 1201-A. Conduct. (a) Authority.--Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each county board shall provide for a period of in-person early voting as provided for under this article.(b) Issuance of ballots and voting booths.-- (1) A registered elector may request to vote early in person at any early voting location in the county of their residence. The county board shall issue a ballot to the registered elector or, in the case of an electronic voting system under Article XI-A, permit the registered elector to vote on the county voting system for in-person early voting. Except as otherwise provided under this article, a registered elector who appears for early voting must vote on the premises designated by the county board for early voting.20250HB1396PN1688 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) On the dates for early voting prescribed under section 1203-A, each county board shall provide ballots or voting booths with electronic voting systems certified by the secretary and other suitable equipment for voting on the premises of the county board and at any other early voting location established by the county board for the conduct of early voting in accordance with this article. Each ballot style must be available in each early voting location, allowing any registered voter of the county to vote in any of the early voting locations.(3) In conducting early voting under this article, an early voting election official shall verify:(i) that the voter is a registered elector;(ii) the election district in which the voter is registered;(iii) the proper ballot of the election district in which the registered elector resides and is entitled to vote before providing an early voting ballot to the applicant, in accordance with section 1210; and(iv) the applicant's registration from the most recent district register provided by the county board. If the applicant is not listed, the election official shall contact the office of the county board.(4) The election official shall maintain a list of all voters who appeared to vote in person. At the end of each early voting day, or at regular intervals during each early voting day if practicable, the list of voters who appeared and cast an early voting ballot shall be transmitted to the county board and entered into the SURE system.(c) Lists of early voters.--The county board shall maintain 20250HB1396PN1688 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a list of each registered elector in each election district who votes. The list must be maintained for each election district in the county and updated daily. The county board shall deliver an updated district register listing voters who have already voted at each early voting location before the start of early voting the following day. All electronic poll books shall be updated to reflect the same.(d) General register.--The county board shall indicate in the general register, or any other system used to update voter histories in real time, whether a voter has voted early in the election. A voter who is listed in the general register as having voted early shall not be permitted to vote by any other method permitted by law, including at their polling place on any primary or election day.(e) Provisional ballot.--Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, any voters who believe they have been erroneously listed as having voted shall be permitted to vote a provisional ballot in accordance with section 1210.Section 1202-A. Early voting locations. (a) Minimum location requirement.--A county board shall establish at least one early voting locations for in-person early voting in the county, which may be located at an office of the county board.(b) Minimum population requirement.--In addition to the requirement under subsection (a), a county board shall establish one early voting location for in-person early voting for every 100,000 voters registered in that county as of the date of the prior election. At least one location shall be in the same municipality as the county seat.(c) Additional locations.--In addition to the requirements 20250HB1396PN1688 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for early voting locations under subsections (a) and (b), a county board may establish additional early voting locations for in-person early voting.(d) Location.--Early voting locations may be located in any location eligible to be selected as a polling place under Article V.(e) Voting.--A registered elector entitled to early voting may vote early at any early voting location established by the county board in their county of residence.(f) Factors.--For an early voting location established under this section or section 1204-A and not located at an office of the county board, the sites must be geographically located to provide all voters in the county an equal opportunity to cast a ballot, as much as practicable, and must provide sufficient nonpermitted parking to accommodate the anticipated number of voters arriving by vehicle. Although the selection of an early voting site is a matter of discretion of the county board, the county board shall consider the following factors:(1) proximity to public transportation lines and availability of parking;(2) proximity to communities which will provide the greatest opportunity for residents of rural areas to vote during the early voting period;(3) proximity to nursing homes, hospitals, long-term care facilities, and public universities or community colleges;(4) travel time to the early voting location; (5) commuter traffic patterns; (6) geographic features that may affect an elector's equitable access to early voting locations;20250HB1396PN1688 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) population density;(8) use of existing voting locations that typically serve a significant number of electors;(9) use of public buildings that are known to electors in the county, especially to the extent that using the buildings results in cost savings compared to other potential locations; and(10) if private locations are considered or designated as early voting locations, methods and standards to ensure the security of voting conducted at the locations.(g) Accessibility.--Early voting locations shall be accessible to persons with disabilities.(h) Prohibition.--An individual, if within an early voting location or temporary early voting location, may not electioneer or solicit votes for a political party, political body or candidate. Written or printed material may not be posted within the early voting location or temporary early voting location, except as required under this act.(i) Distance.--Except for a county designee, watcher, person in the course of voting, including a person delivering an absentee or mail-in ballot to a ballot drop box located in the early voting location, person lawfully giving assistance to a voter and peace and police officer, if permitted under this act, an individual must remain at least 10 feet distant from the early voting location or temporary early voting location during the progress of the voting.(j) Early voting location officials.--(1) The county board shall designate a county employee or, if a county employee is unavailable, appoint a duly elected judge of elections from any election district in the 20250HB1396PN1688 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 county to serve as the presiding election officer in charge at an early voting location.(2) The county board shall also appoint as many additional election officials and clerks as needed to sufficiently staff and operate an early voting location.(3) If appointing election officials at early voting locations, the county board shall appoint individuals from different political parties, including nonaffiliated voters.(4) The duties of the election officials in carrying out the procedures of voting at early voting locations shall comply with the duties of district election officers under this act.(5) All individuals appointed to serve at early voting locations must attend training provided by the county board before they can serve at the early voting location.(6) An election officer, elected or appointed in an election district, may be appointed as an election official or clerk in an early voting location, unless prohibited by law.(7) The secretary shall issue requirements and qualifications for training and appropriate daily rates, as permitted by law, for compensation at staff at early voting locations.(k) Watcher.--Each candidate and each party or political body may appoint one watcher consistent with section 417 who shall be present within the early voting location or temporary early voting location from the time that county designees meet prior to the opening of the early voting location or temporary early voting location until the time that county designees depart the early voting location or temporary early voting 20250HB1396PN1688 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 location. A watcher must be a qualified elector of the county in which the watcher serves and must show their certificates if requested to do so.(l) Voters permitted to vote.--When the hour for closing the early voting location arrives on each day of the early voting period, all qualified electors who have already qualified, and are inside the enclosed space, shall be permitted to vote. Qualified electors who are in the early voting location outside the enclosed space waiting to vote and voters who are in line either inside or outside of the early voting location waiting to vote, shall be permitted to vote.Section 1203-A. Period for early voting. (a) Commencement and ending.--The period for in-person early voting shall begin on the 11th day preceding the date of an election and extend through the Sunday before election day.(b) Schedules.--Except as provided under subsection (c), each early voting location must remain open beginning the 11th day before an election for no less than 8 hours and no more than 12 hours a day between 6 a.m. and 8 p.m. as determined by the county board of elections.(c) Emergency closure.--Notwithstanding subsection (b), a county board may close an early voting location if the building in which the early voting location is located has been closed by a State, county or local agency in response to a severe weather emergency or other emergency. The county board shall notify the Secretary of the Commonwealth of each closure and shall make reasonable efforts to provide notice to the public of an alternative early voting location under section 1204-A.(d) Security of ballots and voting equipment.--The county board shall ensure that each ballot, scanner and other voting 20250HB1396PN1688 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equipment used during the early voting period are secured in accordance with Article XI-A. The following shall apply:(1) At the beginning of each day of early voting, the early voting location officials shall examine every ballot box, scanner and tabulator, if applicable, to ensure that they remain locked and sealed. Upon completion of their examination, the early voting location officials shall sign a declaration attesting to the same on a form prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.(2) At the end of each day of early voting, the early voting location officials shall examine every ballot box, scanner and tabulator, if applicable, to ensure that they remain locked and sealed. Upon completion of their examination, the early voting location officials shall sign a declaration attesting to the same on a form prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.(3) All voting equipment and materials shall be stored in a secure and locked location and access to the locked storage location shall be limited only to designated election officials. A daily written record of persons who entered the locked locations shall be kept and transmitted to the county board at the end of the early voting period.(4) At the conclusion of each day of early voting, the ballot box containing paper ballots or voter verified paper records shall be emptied and the paper ballots or voter verified paper records shall be placed in a secure transit container, locked and sealed with a tamper evident seal. The ballots shall be transported by at least two election officials from the early voting location or others designated by the county board to the county board for secure storage 20250HB1396PN1688 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 until official canvass of votes.(5) At the conclusion of the early voting period, election officials shall follow the procedures for closing the polls as provided for in this act. All voting materials, paper ballots, voter verified paper records and all digital storage devices shall be securely transmitted to the county board for inclusion in the official tally of the election returns. Provided, that no results of early voting shall be disclosed until after the close of the polls on primary or election day.(6) The secretary shall issue directives or instructions for secure chain of custody protocols for early voting locations consistent with national best practices.Section 1204-A. Designation of temporary early voting locations.(a) Temporary early voting locations.--In addition to early voting locations established under section 1202-A, the county board may establish temporary early voting locations for early voting due to an emergency closure under section 1202-A or any other reason. Temporary early voting locations may be located in any location eligible to be selected as a polling place under Article V.(b) Applicability of schedule.-- (1) The schedules for the conduct of early voting under section 1203-A(b) shall apply to temporary early voting locations unless an exception is granted by the secretary.(2) Early voting at temporary early voting locations may be conducted on one or more days and during hours established by the county board.(3) The schedules for the conduct of early voting at a 20250HB1396PN1688 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 temporary early voting location shall not need to be uniform among the temporary early voting locations.(4) (i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii), a county board establishing or changing a temporary early voting location shall publish the information required under section 1206-A at least 10 days before early voting begins.(ii) If a temporary early voting location is established or changed within 10 days of early voting beginning or is established or changed after early voting begins, the county board shall:(A) publish the information required under section 1206-A as soon as the county board determines the temporary early voting location; and(B) post the same on the county's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 1205-A. Public buildings. (a) Early voting locations.-- (1) Upon request by a county board, the governing body of a municipality shall make public buildings within the county available as early voting locations without charge. A request to use a public building shall include reasonably necessary time before and after the period that early voting will be conducted at the public building.(2) A municipality making a public building available as an early voting location shall ensure that any portion of the building made available is accessible to voters with disabilities and elderly voters.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a school may only be used as an in-person early voting location if voting can 20250HB1396PN1688 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occur separately without access to other areas of the school or school children and the location and access comply with the general security procedures in force at the school.Section 1206-A. Publication of early voting locations and schedules.(a) Notice.--No later than 30 days before an election, the county board shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a schedule stating:(1) the location of each early voting location; (2) the location of each temporary early voting location; and(3) the dates and hours that early voting will be conducted at each early voting and temporary early voting location.(b) Posting requirements.--Each county board shall post a copy of the schedule at an office or other location that is to be used as an early voting or temporary early voting location. The schedule must be posted continuously and updated for a period beginning not later than the 10th day before the commencement of early voting and ending on the last day of the early voting period.(c) Copies.--The county board must make copies of the schedule available to the public in reasonable quantities without charge during the period of posting.(d) Electronic posting.-- (1) If the county board maintains a publicly accessible Internet website, the county board shall make the schedule available on the website no later than 30 days before the election.(2) A municipality within the county that maintains a 20250HB1396PN1688 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publicly accessible Internet website shall also make the schedule available on the website no later than 30 days before the election.(e) Prohibition and exception after schedule publication.-- (1) Additional early voting locations may not be established after the schedule is published under this section.(2) Additional temporary early voting locations may be established after the schedule is published if the temporary early voting locations are open to each registered elector. The locations, dates and hours of each additional temporary early voting location shall be reported to the Secretary of the Commonwealth and posted on the county board's, the county's and any municipality located within the county's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 1207-A. List of early voting locations. No later than 30 days before the commencement of early voting, each county board shall provide the Secretary of the Commonwealth with a list of each early voting location and the hours each location will be open for early voting. The secretary shall develop a tool on the department's publicly accessible Internet website for voters to locate early voting location and temporary early voting locations in their counties.Section 1208-A. Results. Results of early voting may not be made available to the public other than through the tabulation process used for votes cast on election day, after the closing of polls.Section 1209-A. Directives of secretary.(a) General rule.--The secretary shall issue a directive to counties specifying in-person early voting polling procedures 20250HB1396PN1688 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and best practices to ensure uniform implementation in every county.(b) Additional directives.--The secretary may issue additional directives as necessary in order to facilitate the administration of early voting and temporary early voting locations.Section 9. Sections 1302.1(a), 1302.2(c), 1304 and 1306 of the act are amended to read:Section 1302.1. Date of Application for Absentee Ballot.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (a.3), applications for absentee ballots shall be received in [the] an office of the county board of elections not earlier than fifty (50) days before the primary or election, except that if a county board of elections determines that it would be appropriate to its operational needs, any applications for absentee ballots received more than fifty (50) days before the primary or election may be processed before that time. Applications for absentee ballots shall be processed if received not later than five o'clock P.M. of the first Tuesday prior to the day of any primary or election.* * *Section 1302.2. Approval of Application for Absentee Ballot.--* * *(c) The county board of elections, upon receipt of any application of a qualified elector required to be registered under the provisions of preceding section 1301, shall determine the qualifications of such applicant by verifying the proof of identification and comparing the information set forth on such application with the information contained on the applicant's permanent registration card. If the board is satisfied that the 20250HB1396PN1688 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant is qualified to receive an official absentee ballot, the application shall be marked "approved." Such approval decision shall be final and binding, except that challenges may be made only on the ground that the applicant was not a qualified elector. Such challenges must be made to the county board of elections prior to five o'clock p.m. on the Friday prior to the election or prior to the pre-canvass of an elector's absentee ballot, whichever is earlier: Provided, however, That a challenge to an application for an absentee ballot shall not be permitted on the grounds that the elector used an application for an absentee ballot instead of an application for a mail-in ballot or on the grounds that the elector used an application for a mail-in ballot instead of an application for an absentee ballot.* * *Section 1304. Envelopes for Official Absentee Ballots.--(a) The county boards of election shall provide two additional envelopes for each official absentee ballot of such size and shape as shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, in order to permit the placing of one within the other and both within the mailing envelope. On the smaller of the two envelopes to be enclosed in the mailing envelope shall be printed, stamped or endorsed the words "Official Election Ballot," and nothing else. On the larger of the two envelopes, to be enclosed within the mailing envelope, shall be printed, stamped or endorsed to conform with election mail design requirements from the United States Postal Service, a prepaid reply mail option under subsection (b), the form of the declaration of the elector, and the name and address of the county board of election of the proper county. The larger 20250HB1396PN1688 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 envelope shall also contain information indicating the local election district of the absentee voter. Said form of declaration and envelope shall be as prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth and shall contain among other things a statement of the electors qualifications, together with a statement that such elector has not already voted in such primary or election. The mailing envelope addressed to the elector shall contain the two envelopes, the official absentee ballot, lists of candidates, when authorized by section 1303 subsection (b) of this act, the uniform instructions in form and substance as prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth and nothing else.(b) The county board of election shall provide prepaid postage for the larger of the two additional envelopes. The county board of election shall utilize a United States Postal Service prepaid reply mail option.(c) The county board of election shall include on both the mailing envelope and larger envelope uniquely serialized United States Postal Service Intelligent Mail barcodes which shall include a service type identifier or an equivalent successor barcode or identifier that allows mail tracking of uniquely serialized barcoded envelopes as specified by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.Section 1306. Voting by Absentee Electors.--(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3), at any time after receiving an official absentee ballot, but on or before eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election, the elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, 20250HB1396PN1688 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then [fill out, date and] sign the declaration printed on such envelope. Such envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to [said] a county board of election[.] or at a ballot drop box.(2) Any elector, spouse of the elector or dependent of the elector, qualified in accordance with the provisions of section 1301, subsections (e), (f), (g) and (h) to vote by absentee ballot as herein provided, shall be required to include on the form of declaration a supporting declaration in form prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, to be signed by the head of the department or chief of division or bureau in which the elector is employed, setting forth the identity of the elector, spouse of the elector or dependent of the elector.(3) Any elector who has filed his application in accordance with section 1302 subsection (e)(2), and is unable to sign his declaration because of illness or physical disability, shall be excused from signing upon making a declaration which shall be witnessed by one adult person in substantially the following form: I hereby declare that I am unable to sign my declaration for voting my absentee ballot without assistance because I am unable to write by reason of my illness or physical disability. I have made or received assistance in making my mark in lieu of my signature.20250HB1396PN1688 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 .............................. .......................(Mark)(Date).............................. .............................(Complete Address of Witness) (Signature of Witness)(b) (1) Any elector who receives and votes an absentee ballot pursuant to section 1301 shall not be eligible to vote at a polling place on election day. The district register at each polling place shall clearly identify electors who have received and voted absentee ballots as ineligible to vote at the polling place, and district election officers shall not permit electors who voted an absentee ballot to vote at the polling place.(2) An elector who requests an absentee ballot and who is not shown on the district register as having voted the ballot may vote by provisional ballot under section 1210(a.4)(1).(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), an elector who requests an absentee ballot and who is not shown on the district register as having voted the ballot may vote at the polling place if the elector remits the ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector to the judge of elections to be spoiled and the elector signs a statement subject to the penalties under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities) in substantially the following form:I hereby declare that I am a qualified registered elector who has obtained an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot. I further declare that I have not cast my absentee ballot or mail-in ballot, and that instead I remitted my absentee ballot or mail-in ballot and the envelope containing the declaration of the elector to the judge of elections at my polling place to be spoiled and therefore request that my absentee ballot or 20250HB1396PN1688 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mail-in ballot be voided.(Date)(Signature of Elector)................(Address of Elector)(Local Judge of Elections)(c) Except as provided under 25 Pa.C.S. § 3511 (relating to receipt of voted ballot), a completed absentee ballot must be received in the office of the county board of elections no later than eight o'clock P.M. on the day of the primary or election.(d) (1) Nothing under this section shall be construed to prohibit an individual from returning an absentee ballot for an elector, if the individual is:(i) rendering assistance to a disabled voter or an emergency absentee voter as authorized by law;(ii) returning the completed ballot of another member of the individual's household;(iii) returning the completed ballot of a family member; or(iv) returning the completed ballot of an elector under the individual's care.(2) For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "family member" means a parent, grandparent or adult child.Section 10. Section 1308(a), (b) and (g)(1)(ii), (1.1), (2) and (4)(ii) and (iii) of the act are amended and subsection (g) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1308. Canvassing of Official Absentee Ballots and Mail-in Ballots.--(a) The county boards of election, upon receipt of official absentee ballots in sealed official absentee ballot envelopes as provided under this article and mail-in ballots as in sealed official mail-in ballot envelopes as provided under Article XIII-D, shall [safely keep the ballots in sealed or locked containers until they are to be canvassed by 20250HB1396PN1688 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the county board of elections. An absentee ballot, whether issued to a civilian, military or other voter during the regular or emergency application period, shall be canvassed in accordance with subsection (g). A mail-in ballot shall be canvassed in accordance with subsection (g).] mark the date of receipt in the voter's record and shall examine the ballot envelope containing the declaration of the elector to verify completion of the declaration as required under sections 1306 and 1306-D. The following shall apply:(1) If the declaration of the elector has been completed as required under sections 1306 and 1306-D, the absentee and mail-in ballots shall be safely kept until the ballots are to be pre-canvassed or canvassed by the county board of elections. An absentee ballot, notwithstanding if the absentee ballot is issued to a civilian, military or other voter, shall be pre-canvassed or canvassed in accordance with subsection (g). A mail-in ballot shall be pre-canvassed in accordance with subsection (g).(2) If the declaration of the elector has not been signed as required under sections 1306 and 1306-D, the county board of elections shall enter into the voter's record in the voter registration system that the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot has a defect with the voter's declaration requiring correction in order for the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot to be counted. The following shall apply:(i) Within twenty-four (24) hours of a finding under this paragraph, the county board of elections shall notify the voter by electronic or telephonic means of the error, if the voter's email or phone number is included in the voter's record or application and shall provide an Absentee Ballot and Mail-in 20250HB1396PN1688 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Ballot Cure Form. The county board shall notify all such voters by letter. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall create a form that is accessible by and can be completed through paper, electronic and telephonic means. The form shall contain a location for the voter to place the voter's Pennsylvania driver's license or Department of Transportation identification card number or last four digits of the voter's Social Security number and instructions on how to return the form. Instead of providing a driver's license, Department of Transportation identification card number or the last four digits of the voter's Social Security number, a voter may provide a legible copy or photograph of a government-issued document, including an official Federal, State, county or municipal document which lists the voter's name, a student identification document issued by an institution of higher education as defined in section 118(c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, in this Commonwealth or a utility bill, telephone bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck or tax or rent receipt which lists the voter's name. The cure shall include the following attestation in substantially the following form:I hereby declare that I am a qualified registered elector in this election who requested and returned an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot to (county) and that I have not and will not vote more than one ballot in this election.(Date)(Signature of Elector)(ii) The Absentee Ballot and Mail-in Ballot Cure Form and instructions on how to return the form shall be made available on the Department of State and each county board of election's 20250HB1396PN1688 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) If the voter completes and returns the Absentee Ballot and Mail-in Ballot Cure Form before noon on the sixth day after the election, the voter's ballot shall be counted as provided under subsection (g)(4)(iii). If the voter fails to complete and return the form before noon on the sixth day after the election, the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot shall be set aside and declared void. The voter may return the Absentee Ballot and Mail-in Ballot Cure Form by email, fax, text message or other form of electronic submission, mail or delivery in person to the county board of elections.(iv) The county board of elections shall provide the voter with information on how to vote by provisional ballot on election day instead of completing an Absentee Ballot and Mail-In Ballot Cure Form.(v) Within twenty-four (24) hours of a finding under paragraph (2), counties shall compile a list of voters eligible to cure defective ballots and must make the list available to the public, including posting it to the counties' publicly accessible Internet website.[(b) Watchers shall be permitted to be present when the envelopes containing official absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are opened and when such ballots are counted and recorded.]* * *(g) (1) * * *(ii) An absentee ballot cast by any absentee elector as defined in section 1301(i), (j), (k), (l), (m) and (n), an absentee ballot under section [1302(a.3)] 1302.1(a.3) or a mail-in ballot cast by a mail-in elector shall be canvassed in 20250HB1396PN1688 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with this subsection if the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot is received in [the] an office of the county board of elections or delivered to a ballot drop box no later than eight o'clock P.M. on the day of the primary or election.(1.1) The county board of elections shall meet no earlier than [seven] nine o'clock A.M. on the seventh day prior to election day and no later than seven o'clock A.M. on election day to pre-canvass all ballots received prior to the meeting. The pre-canvass meeting may continue until eight o'clock P.M. on election day. A county board of elections shall provide at least forty-eight hours' notice of a pre-canvass meeting by publicly posting a notice of a pre-canvass meeting on its publicly accessible Internet website. One authorized representative of each candidate in an election and one representative from each political party shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are pre-canvassed. No person observing, attending or participating in a pre-canvass meeting may disclose the results of any portion of any pre-canvass meeting prior to the close of the polls.(2) The county board of elections shall meet no earlier than the close of polls on the day of the election and no later than the [third] day following the election to begin canvassing absentee ballots and mail-in ballots not included in the pre-canvass meeting. The meeting under this paragraph shall continue until all absentee ballots and mail-in ballots received prior to the close of the polls have been canvassed. The county board of elections shall not record or publish any votes reflected on the ballots prior to the close of the polls. The canvass process shall continue through the eighth day following the election for valid military-overseas ballots timely received under 25 Pa.C.S. 20250HB1396PN1688 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 3511 (relating to receipt of voted ballot). A county board of elections shall provide at least forty-eight hours' notice of a canvass meeting by publicly posting a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website. One authorized representative of each candidate in an election and one representative from each political party shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are canvassed.* * *(4) All absentee ballots which have not been challenged under section 1302.2(c) and all mail-in ballots which have not been challenged under section 1302.2-D(a)(2) and that have been verified under paragraph (3) shall be counted and included with the returns of the applicable election district as follows:* * *(ii) [If] Notwithstanding sections 1306 and 1306-D, if any of the envelopes on which are printed, stamped or endorsed the words "Official Election Ballot" contain any text, mark or symbol which reveals the identity of the elector, the elector's political affiliation or the elector's candidate preference, [the envelopes and the ballots contained therein shall be set aside and declared void.] or the ballot is not sealed inside the Official Election Ballot envelope, the presence of such text, mark or symbol or the failure to seal the ballot in the Official Election Ballot envelope shall not be a fatal defect to the ballot. The county board of elections shall place the voted absentee ballot or voted mail-in ballot into an Official Election Ballot envelope in a manner as to maintain the secrecy of the voted absentee ballot or voted mail-in ballot. The Official Election Ballot envelope shall be sealed and shall be pre-canvassed or canvassed in accordance with subparagraph 20250HB1396PN1688 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii).(iii) The county board shall then break the seals of such envelopes, remove the ballots and count, compute and tally the votes. If an absentee ballot or mail-in ballot is damaged or defective so that the absentee ballot or mail-in ballot cannot properly be counted by the automatic tabulating equipment, the county board shall make and substitute a true duplicate copy for the damaged absentee ballot or mail-in ballot. Each duplicate absentee ballot or mail-in ballot shall be clearly labeled "duplicate" and shall bear a serial number which shall be recorded on the damaged or defective absentee ballot or mail-in ballot.* * *(8) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall develop an electronic system through which qualified electors may track and verify the status of the qualified elector's absentee or mail-in ballot, including, but not limited to, the dates that the ballot was mailed by the county board, received by the county board, pre-canvassed and accepting for counting, pre-canvassed and in need of cure or rejected for a flaw not subject to cure, along with details of the defect or reason for rejection.* * *Section 11. Sections 1302-D(g), 1302.1-D(a) and 1302.2-D(a)(3) of the act are amended to read:Section 1302-D. Applications for official mail-in ballots.* * *(g) Permanent mail-in voting list.--(1) [Any qualified registered elector may request to be placed on a permanent mail-in ballot list file at any time during the calendar year. A mail-in ballot application shall 20250HB1396PN1688 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be mailed to every person otherwise eligible to receive a mail-in ballot application by the first Monday in February each year or within 48 hours of receipt of the request, whichever is later, so long as the person does not lose the person's voting rights by failure to vote as otherwise required by this act. A mail-in ballot application mailed to an elector under this section, which is completed and timely returned by the elector, shall serve as an application for any and all primary, general or special elections to be held in the remainder of that calendar year and for all special elections to be held before the third Monday in February of the succeeding year.] Any qualified registered elector may request to be placed on a permanent mail-in ballot list at any time during the calendar year by submitting a mail-in ballot application and checking a box on the application that affirms their decision to permanently receive mail-in ballots for future elections. If the application is approved, the qualified registered elector shall be placed on the permanent mail-in voting list and receive permanent mail-in voter status under this section. A qualified registered elector who has requested and been approved for permanent mail-in voter status shall receive a mail-in ballot for all primary, general or special elections until the elector revokes their permanent mail-in voter status or ceases being a qualified elector as provided in this act.(2) The Secretary of the Commonwealth [may] shall develop an electronic system through which all qualified electors may apply for a mail-in ballot and request permanent mail-in voter status under this section, provided the system is able to capture a digitized or electronic signature of the 20250HB1396PN1688 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant. A county board of elections shall treat an application or request received through the electronic system as if the application or request had been submitted on a paper form or any other format used by the county.(3) The transfer of a qualified registered elector on a permanent mail-in voting list from one county to another county shall only be permitted upon the request of the qualified registered elector.(4) By the first Monday in February each year, a notice developed by the department shall be sent to every elector on the permanent mail-in ballot list advising the elector that they will receive a mail-in ballot for any primary, general or special elections until the elector revokes their permanent mail-in voter status or ceases being a qualified elector.Section 1302.1-D. Date of application for mail-in ballot.(a) General rule.--Applications for mail-in ballots shall be received in the office of the county board of elections not earlier than 50 days before the primary or election, except that if a county board of elections determines that it would be appropriate to the county board of elections' operational needs, any applications for mail-in ballots received more than 50 days before the primary or election may be processed before that time. [Applications] Except as provided in subsection (a.1), applications for mail-in ballots shall be processed if received not later than five o'clock P.M. [of the first Tuesday] on the fourteenth day prior to the day of any primary or election.* * *Section 1302.2-D. Approval of application for mail-in ballot.(a) Approval process.--The county board of elections, upon 20250HB1396PN1688 - 65 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receipt of any application of a qualified elector under section 1301-D, shall determine the qualifications of the applicant by verifying the proof of identification and comparing the information provided on the application with the information contained on the applicant's permanent registration card. The following shall apply:* * *(3) Challenges must be made to the county board of elections prior to five o'clock p.m. on the Friday prior to the election or prior to the pre-canvass of an elector's mail-in ballot, whichever is earlier: Provided, however, That a challenge to an application for a mail-in ballot shall not be permitted on the grounds that the elector used an application for a mail-in ballot instead of an application for an absentee ballot or on the grounds that the elector used an application for an absentee ballot instead of an application for a mail-in ballot.* * *Section 12. Sections 1304-D(a) and 1306-D(a) of the act are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1304-D. Envelopes for official mail-in ballots.(a) Additional envelopes.--The county boards of election shall provide two additional envelopes for each official mail-in ballot of a size and shape as shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, in order to permit the placing of one within the other and both within the mailing envelope. On the smaller of the two envelopes to be enclosed in the mailing envelope shall be printed, stamped or endorsed the words "Official Election Ballot," and nothing else. On the larger of 20250HB1396PN1688 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the two envelopes, to be enclosed within the mailing envelope, shall be printed, stamped or endorsed to conform with election mail design requirements from the United States Postal Service, a prepaid reply mail option pursuant to subsection (a.1), the form of the declaration of the elector and the name and address of the county board of election of the proper county. The larger envelope shall also contain information indicating the local election district of the mail-in voter.(a.1) Prepaid postage.--The county board of elections shall provide prepaid postage for the larger of the two additional envelopes. The county board of elections shall utilize a United States Postal Service prepaid reply mail option.(a.2) Mail tracking.--The county board of elections shall include on both the mailing envelope and larger envelope uniquely serialized United States Postal Service Intelligent Mail barcodes which shall include a service type identifier or an equivalent successor barcode or identifier that the allows mail tracking as specified by the Secretary of the Commonwealth.* * *Section 1306-D. Voting by mail-in electors.(a) General rule.--At any time after receiving an official mail-in ballot, but on or before eight o'clock P.M. the day of the primary or election, the mail-in elector shall, in secret, proceed to mark the ballot only in black lead pencil, indelible pencil or blue, black or blue-black ink, in fountain pen or ball point pen, and then fold the ballot, enclose and securely seal the same in the envelope on which is printed, stamped or endorsed "Official Election Ballot." This envelope shall then be placed in the second one, on which is printed the form of declaration of the elector, and the address of the elector's 20250HB1396PN1688 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 county board of election and the local election district of the elector. The elector shall then [fill out, date and] sign the declaration printed on such envelope. Such envelope shall then be securely sealed and the elector shall send same by mail, postage prepaid, except where franked, or deliver it in person to said county board of election[.] or at a ballot drop box.* * *(d) Construction.--(1) Nothing under this section shall be construed to prohibit an individual from returning a mail-in ballot for an elector, if the individual is:(i) rendering assistance to a disabled voter as authorized by law;(ii) returning the completed ballot of another member of the individual's household;(iii) returning the completed ballot of a family member; or(iv) returning the completed ballot of an elector under the individual's care.(2) For the purposes of paragraph (1) (iii), the term "family member" means a parent, grandparent or adult child.Section 13. Sections 1404(f), 1602-A(j)(1), 1701(a), (a.1)(2)(ii), (b), (d) and (e), 1702(a)(1) and (2)(ii)(B), (a.1), (b.1) and (b.2), 1703(a)(1) and 1827 of the act are amended to read:Section 1404. Computation of Returns by County Board; Certification; Issuance of Certificates of Election.--* * *(f) As the returns from each election district are read, computed and found to be correct or corrected as aforesaid, they 20250HB1396PN1688 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be recorded on the blanks prepared for the purpose until all the returns from the various election districts which are entitled to be counted shall have been duly recorded, when they shall be added together, announced and attested by the clerks who made and computed the entries respectively and signed by the members of the county board. Returns under this subsection shall be considered unofficial for [five (5)] three (3) days. The county board shall submit the unofficial returns to the Secretary of the Commonwealth by five o'clock P. M. on the Tuesday following the election. The submission shall be as directed by the secretary for public office which appears on the ballot in every election district in this Commonwealth or for a ballot question which appears on the ballot in every election district in this Commonwealth. At the expiration of [five (5)] three (3) days after the completion of the computation of votes, in case no petition for a recount or recanvass has been filed in accordance with the provisions of this act, or upon the completion of the recount or recanvass if a petition therefor has been filed within [five (5)] three (3) days after the completion of the computation of votes, the county board shall certify the returns so computed in said county in the manner required by this act, unless upon appeals taken from any decision, the court of common pleas shall have directed any returns to be revised, or unless in case of a recount, errors in the said returns shall have been found, in which case said returns shall be revised, corrected and certified accordingly. The county board shall thereupon, in the case of elections, issue certificates of election to the successful candidates for all county, city, borough, township, ward, school district, poor district and election offices, and local party offices to be 20250HB1396PN1688 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filled by the votes of the electors of said county, or of any part thereof.* * *Section 1602-A. Funding for elections.* * *(j) Grant agreement.--The grant agreement between the department and the county under this section shall include the following requirements for counties:(1) The county shall begin pre-canvassing [at] no later than 7 a.m. on election day and shall continue without interruption until each mail-in ballot and absentee ballot timely received [by 7 a.m. on election day] is [pre-canvassed] canvassed.* * *Section 1701. Opening Ballot Boxes upon Petition of Electors Alleging Fraud or Error; Deposit or Bond.--(a) Except as set forth in subsection (a.1), the court of common pleas, or a judge thereof, of the county in which any election district is located in which ballots were used, shall open the ballot box of such election district used at any general, municipal, special or primary election held therein, and cause the entire vote thereof to be correctly counted by persons designated by such court or judge, if three qualified electors of the election district shall file, as hereinafter provided, a petition duly verified by them, alleging that upon information which they consider reliable they believe that fraud or error, although not manifest on the general return of votes made therefrom, was committed in the computation of the votes cast for all offices or for any particular office or offices in such election district, or in the marking of the ballots, or otherwise in connection with such 20250HB1396PN1688 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ballots. It shall [not] be necessary for the petitioners to specify in their petition the particular act of fraud or error which they believe to have been committed, [nor] and to offer evidence to substantiate the allegations of their petition.(a.1) In cases resulting from a recount or recanvass order by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under section 1404(g), all of the following apply:* * *(2) To obtain relief under clause (1):* * *(ii) It is [not] necessary for the petitioners to specify in their petition the particular act of fraud or error which they believe to have been committed [nor] and to offer evidence to substantiate the allegations of their petition.(b) Every petition for the opening of a ballot box under the provisions of this section shall be filed in the office of the prothonotary of the proper county, accompanied by a deposit of cash in the amount of [fifty ($50.00)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars, or by a bond signed by the petitioners as principals and by a corporate surety to be approved by the court, in the amount of [one hundred ($100.00)] one thousand five hundred ($1,500) dollars, conditioned upon the payment to the county treasurer for the use of the county of the sum of [fifty ($50.00)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars, in the event that, upon the opening of the ballot box, it shall not appear that fraud or substantial error was committed in the computation of the votes cast on the ballots contained therein, or fraud in the marking of the ballots contained therein, or otherwise in connection with such ballots.* * *20250HB1396PN1688 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) If, upon opening any such ballot box, it shall appear that fraud or substantial error was committed in the computation of the votes cast on the ballots contained therein, or fraud in the marking of the ballots contained therein, or otherwise in connection with such ballots, it shall be the duty of the court to certify such fact to the prothonotary and thereupon the prothonotary shall return to the petitioners the said sum of [fifty ($50.00)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars, or if the petitioners shall have filed a bond in lieu of cash, to mark said bond cancelled and notify the petitioners that he has done so.(e) If, upon opening any ballot box under the provisions of this section, it shall not appear that fraud or substantial error was committed in the computation of the votes cast on the ballots contained therein, or fraud in the marking of the ballots contained therein, or otherwise in connection with such ballots, the persons upon whose petition such ballot box shall have been opened shall forfeit to the county the sum of [fifty ($50.00)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars. If said petitioners shall have deposited the said sum in cash with the prothonotary at the time of filing the petition, the prothonotary, upon certification of the court that fraud or substantial error was not discovered, shall pay said sum deposited with him to the county treasurer; and if the petitioners shall have filed with their petition a bond in the sum of [one hundred ($100.00)] one thousand five hundred ($1,500) dollars, it shall be the duty of the county treasurer forthwith to collect from the principals or surety on said bond, the sum of [fifty ($50.00)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars, and costs of suit, and for this purpose, he is hereby authorized 20250HB1396PN1688 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to institute any necessary legal proceedings. When so collected, the said sum of [fifty ($50.00)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars shall be paid over to the county treasurer.* * *Section 1702. Recanvassing Voting Machines upon Petition of Electors Alleging Fraud or Error.--(a) Judicial proceedings shall be as follows:(1) Except as set forth in clause (2), the court of common pleas, or a judge thereof, of the county in which any election district is located, shall make visible the registering counters of the voting machine or machines used in such election district at any primary or election, and without unlocking the machine against voting, shall recanvass the vote cast therein, if three qualified electors of the election district shall file a petition, duly verified by them, alleging that, upon information which they consider reliable, they believe that fraud or error, although not manifest on the general return of votes made therefrom, was committed in the canvassing of the votes cast on such machine or machines. It shall [not] be necessary for the petitioners to specify in their petition the particular act of fraud or error they believe to have been committed, [nor] and to offer evidence to substantiate the allegations of their petition.(2) In cases resulting from a recount or recanvass ordered by the Secretary of the Commonwealth under section 1404(g), all of the following apply:* * *(ii) To obtain relief under subclause (i):* * *(B) It is [not] necessary for the petitioners to specify in 20250HB1396PN1688 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 their petition the particular act of fraud or error they believe to have been committed [nor] and to offer evidence to substantiate the allegations of the petition.(a.1) Every petition for the recanvassing of votes cast in the voting machine, or voting machines of an election district, under the provisions of this section, shall be filed in the office of the prothonotary of the proper county accompanied by a deposit of cash in the amount of [fifty ($50)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars, or by a bond signed by the petitioners as principals and by a corporate surety to be approved by the court in the amount of [one hundred ($100)] one thousand five hundred ($1,500) dollars, conditioned upon the payment to the county treasurer for the use of the county of the sum of [fifty ($50)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars, in the event that upon the recanvassing of the votes cast in a voting machine or voting machines, it does not appear that fraud or substantial error was committed in the canvassing of the votes cast on such machine or otherwise in connection with such voting machines.* * *(b.1) If, upon the recanvassing of the votes in any voting machine, it shall appear that fraud or substantial error was committed in the computation of the votes cast on the voting machine or otherwise in connection with such voting machine, it shall be the duty of the court to certify such fact to the prothonotary, and thereupon the prothonotary shall return to the petitioners the said sum of [fifty ($50)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars, or if the petitioners shall have filed a bond, in lieu of cash, to mark said bond cancelled and notify the petitioners that he has done so.(b.2) If, upon the recanvassing of the votes in any voting 20250HB1396PN1688 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 machine under the provisions of this section, it shall not appear that fraud or substantial error was committed in the computation of the votes cast in the voting machine or otherwise in connection with such voting machine, the persons upon whose petition such voting machine was recanvassed shall forfeit to the county the sum of [fifty ($50)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars. If said petitioners shall have deposited the said sum in cash with the prothonotary at the time of filing the petition, the prothonotary, upon certification of the court that fraud or substantial error or otherwise in connection with such machine was not discovered, shall pay said sum deposited with him to the county treasurer, and if the petitioners shall have filed with their petition a bond in the sum of [one hundred ($100)] one thousand five hundred ($1,500) dollars, it shall be the duty of the county treasurer forthwith to collect from the principals or surety on said bond the sum of [fifty ($50)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars and costs of suit, and for this purpose he is hereby authorized to institute any necessary legal proceedings. When so collected, the said sum of [fifty ($50)] eight hundred fifty ($850) dollars shall be paid over to the county treasurer.* * *Section 1703. Correction of Returns; Decision Not to Be Final; Evidence for Prosecution.--(a) (1) Any petition to open a ballot box or to recanvass the votes on a voting machine or an electronic voting system pursuant to sections 1701 and 1702 shall be filed no later than [five (5)] three (3) days after the completion of the computational canvassing of all returns of the county by the county board. If any error or fraud is found the court shall 20250HB1396PN1688 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grant the interested parties an additional five (5) days to file petitions requesting additional ballot boxes to be opened or voting machines or electronic voting systems to be recanvassed.(i) Except as set forth in subclause (ii):(A) a recount or recanvass shall include all election districts in which ballots were cast for the office in question; and(B) petitions, accompanied by the appropriate money or bond, must be filed in each election district in accordance with this act.(ii) Subclause (i) shall not apply if a petitioner under section 1701 or 1702 pleads that a particular act of fraud or error occurred and offers prima facie evidence supporting the allegation.(iii) The county board shall have three (3) days to file a response to any petition for recount filed with the court.* * *Section 1827. Interference with Primaries and Elections; Frauds; Conspiracy.--If any person shall prevent or attempt to prevent any election officers from holding any primary or election, under the provisions of this act, or shall use or threaten any violence to any such officer; or shall interrupt or improperly interfere with him in the execution of his duty; or shall block up or attempt to block up the avenue to the door of any polling place; or shall use or practice any intimidation, threats, force or violence with design to influence unduly or overawe any elector, or to prevent him from voting or restrain his freedom of choice; or shall prepare or present to any election officer a fraudulent voter's certificate not signed in the polling place by the elector whose certificate it purports 20250HB1396PN1688 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to be; or shall deposit fraudulent ballots in the ballot box; or shall register fraudulent votes upon any voting machine; or shall tamper with any district register, voting check list, numbered lists of voters, ballot box, ballot drop box or voting machine; or shall conspire with others to commit any of the offenses herein mentioned, or in any manner to prevent a free and fair primary or election, he shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding fifteen thousand ($15,000) dollars, or to undergo an imprisonment of not more than seven (7) years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 14. Section 1222(c) of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1222. SURE system.* * *(c) Requirements.--The SURE system shall be developed as a single, uniform integrated computer system. All commissions shall be connected electronically to the SURE system and shall maintain their registration records in the system. The SURE system shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:* * *(22) Facilitate the use of electronic poll books.(23) Contain a code to enable identification and tracking of preregistration status.(24) Automatically activate the registration of a preregistrant no later than the 18th birthday of the preregistrant.* * *Section 15. Section 1301(a) of Title 25 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:20250HB1396PN1688 - 77 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 1301. Qualifications to register.(a) Eligibility.--An individual who will be at least 18 years of age on the day of the next election, who has been a citizen of the United States for at least one month prior to the next election and who has resided in this Commonwealth and the election district where the individual offers to vote for at least 30 days prior to the next ensuing election [and has not been confined in a penal institution for a conviction of a felony within the last five years] shall be eligible to register as provided in this chapter.(a.1) Preregistration.--Notwithstanding subsection (a), every individual who is otherwise qualified to register and is 16 years of age or older may preregister and update the individual's preregistered information by any means authorized under this part for individuals 18 years of age or older. Upon reaching 18 years of age, the individual is automatically registered.* * * (RESERVED).Section 16. Sections 1323(a)(1), (c)(1), (2), (3), (3.1) and (4) of Title 25 are amended, subsections (b) and (c) are amended by adding introductory paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1323. Application with driver's license application.* * *(a) General rule.--(1) The Department of Transportation shall provide for simultaneous application for voter registration in conjunction with the process under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1510 (relating to issuance and content of driver's license). An application under this subsection shall serve as an 20250HB1396PN1688 - 78 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application to register to vote unless the applicant [fails to sign the voter registration application.] presents a document for purposes of the driver's license application demonstrating that the applicant is not a United States Citizen, affirms that the applicant is not a United States Citizen or declines to submit a voter registration application under the process specified in this section. The secretary has the primary responsibility for implementing and enforcing the driver's license voter registration system created under this section. The secretary, in consultation with the Secretary of Transportation, may promulgate regulations for implementing this section.* * *(b) Process.--Except as provided in subsection (c.1)(2):* * *(c) Transmission.--Except as provided in subsection (c.1)(2):(1) The Department of Transportation shall forward completed applications or contents of the completed voter registration applications in [machine-readable] an electronic format to the department by the close of registration for the ensuing election.(2) The department shall transmit the material to the appropriate commission [within ten days] on the next business day after the date of its receipt by the Department of Transportation. [If a voter registration application is received by the Department of Transportation within five days before the last day to register before an election, the application shall be transmitted to the appropriate commission not later than five days after the date of its 20250HB1396PN1688 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receipt by the Department of Transportation.](3) Upon receipt of the completed voter registration information from the department, the commission shall make a record of the date of the receipt of the application and process the application. [No applicant shall be deemed eligible to vote until the commission has received and approved the application.(3.1) After the Department of Transportation is connected to the SURE system and notwithstanding paragraphs (1), (2) and (3), the Department of Transportation shall transmit electronically the contents of a completed voter registration application within five days of receipt of the application. Upon receipt of the information from the Department of Transportation, a commission shall make a record of the date of the receipt of the application and process the application in accordance with section 1328 (relating to approval of registration applications). If the commission of the county of residence has not been connected to the SURE system, the Department of Transportation shall forward the completed application or contents of the completed application to the department in accordance with paragraph (1). No applicant shall be deemed eligible to vote until the commission has received and approved an application in accordance with section 1328.](4) [Changes of address shall comply with] If the application submitted under subsection (a)(3) is for change of address, the following shall apply: [THE FOLLOWING:] FOR A CHANGE OF ADDRESS UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3), IF THE CHANGE OF ADDRESS IS FOR AN ELECTOR CURRENTLY REGISTERED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:20250HB1396PN1688 - 80 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) [Before the Department of Transportation is connected to the SURE system, the Department of Transportation shall notify the department of changes of address received under subsection (a)(3). The department shall notify the commission of the county of the registrant's former residence. After the Department of Transportation is connected to the SURE system, the Department of Transportation shall notify the commission of the county of the registrant's former residence.] If the registrant has moved to an address outside this Commonwealth, the [commission] department shall notify the commission of the county of the registrant's former residence, which shall verify the address change in accordance with section 1901 (relating to removal of electors). [Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), if the registrant confirms in accordance with section 1901(d) that he has moved to another county, the commission shall cancel the registration and forward the registrant's registration information to the commission of the registrant's new county of residence. Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), if the registrant has moved to an address within the commission's jurisdiction, the commission shall promptly update the registration record of the registrant in accordance with section 1328. All changes of address received by the Department of Transportation under this section at least 30 days before an election must be processed by the commission for the ensuing election. For the purpose of this paragraph, the term "registration information" means the registration card and any other record of registration maintained by a 20250HB1396PN1688 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commission.(ii) In the case of changes of address received by the Department of Transportation which do not contain a signature of the registrant, the commission receiving the change of address notification shall mail a notice to the registrant at the new residence address requesting verification of the address change. If the change of address is to a new residence outside the commission's jurisdiction, the commission shall mail the following notice:Date.................Office of the Registration Commission.......... County, Pennsylvania....... (Address and Telephone No. of County)We have been notified by the Department of Transportation that you recently changed your address from ................. (old residence address) to ............... (new residence address) and that this change of address is to serve as a change of address for voter registration purposes. Unless you notify this office within ten days from the date of this notice that this information is not correct, your voter registration will be transferred to ........ County. You may notify this office by writing your residence address, the date and your signature on the bottom of this form and mailing this notice to this office. You need not notify this office if this information is correct.............................Chief ClerkIf the address change is within the commission's 20250HB1396PN1688 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 jurisdiction, the commission shall mail a voter's identification card to the registrant at the new residence address.(iii) If the registrant does not return the notice under subparagraph (ii) within the ten-day period, the commission shall process the change of address according to subparagraph (i). If the registrant notifies the commission that the information is incorrect and the commission is satisfied with the registrant's explanation of the discrepancy, the address of the registrant's registration shall remain unchanged. If the verification notification or voter identification card is returned by the post office as undeliverable as addressed or with a forwarding address, the commission shall send a confirmation notice to the registrant's address of former residence in accordance with section 1901(d)(2).](ii) If the registrant has moved to another county within this Commonwealth, the department shall notify the commission of the county of the registrant's new residence, which shall process the application in accordance with section 1328(b)(5) (relating to ap proval of registration applications) . (iii) If the registrant has moved to a different address in the same county, the department shall notify the commission of the county of the registrant, which shall update the registration record of the registrant in accordance with section 1328.* * *(c.1) Individuals entitled to voter registration application.--20250HB1396PN1688 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Department of Transportation shall transmit voter registration information to the department under paragraph (3) within five days of receipt of an application if the applicant : (I) presented a document as part of the driver's license application demonstrating that the applicant is a United States citizen . ; OR (II) IS CURRENTLY REGISTERED TO VOTE IN THIS COMMONWEALTH BASED ON INFORMATION FROM THE SURE SYSTEM PROVIDED BY THE SECRETARY.(2) The Department of Transportation may not provide an application for voter registration as part of a driver's license application under subsection (b) and may not transmit voter registration information to the department under subsection (c) or subsection (c.1) if the applicant:(i) presents a document for purposes of the driver's license application demonstrating that the applicant is not a United States citizen at the time of the driver's license application; or(ii) makes an affirmation that the applicant is not a United States citizen at the time of the driver's license application, if the affirmation is required for purposes of the driver's license application.(3) The voter registration information transmitted under paragraph (1) shall be determined and prescribed by the secretary and the Secretary of Transportation. Upon receipt of voter registration information for an applicant under paragraph (1), a commission shall promptly process the application or update the registration record of the registrant in accordance with section 1328.20250HB1396PN1688 - 84 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *Section 17. Section 1325(a) introductory paragraph and (b)(4) of Title 25 are amended to read:§ 1325. Government agencies.(a) General rule.--The secretary shall administer a system whereby all offices in this Commonwealth that provide public assistance, each county clerk of orphans' court, including each marriage license bureau, all offices in this Commonwealth that provide State-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities [and], each institution that is part of the State System of Higher Education, all armed forces recruitment centers and additional offices as designated by the secretary, do all of the following:* * *(b) Forms.--An agency designated in subsection (a) shall provide a form for office visits or, if the agency provides services to persons with disabilities, for home visits which contains all of the following:* * *(4) The statement "In order to be qualified to register to vote, you must be at least 18 years of age on the day of the next election, you must have been a citizen of the United States for at least one month prior to the next election and have resided in Pennsylvania and the election district where you plan to vote for at least 30 days prior to the next election[, and you must not have been confined in a penal institution for a conviction of a felony within the last five years]."* * *Section 18. Section 1328(b)(4), (5), (6) and (7), (c)(1) 20250HB1396PN1688 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 introductory paragraph and (2) and (d) of Title 25 are amended and subsections (b) and (c) are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1328. Approval of registration applications.* * *(b) Decision.--A commission shall do one of the following:* * *(4) [Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and update its registration records] Promptly update the applicant's existing registration record if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests [registration] any change of information on the applicant's registration record other than a change under paragraph (7) or (8).(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(iii) The applicant is currently a registered elector of the county.(4.1) Take no further action if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests registration.(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(iii) The applicant is currently a registered elector of the county.(iv) The information on the application exactly 20250HB1396PN1688 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 matches the information contained in the SURE system.(5) [Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and request transfer of registration records] Transfer the registration record in accordance with subsection (d) if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests registration.(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(iii) The applicant is currently a registered elector of another county.(6) [Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and request transfer of registration records in accordance with subsection (d) if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests a transfer of registration.(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(iii) The applicant is currently a registered elector of another county.] (Reserved).(7) Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and update its registration if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) The application requests a change of address, change of party or any other change affecting the voter's 20250HB1396PN1688 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 identification card other than a change of name.(ii) The application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(iii) The applicant is currently a registered elector of the county.* * *(9) Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) all of the following:(i) the application contains voter registration information transmitted under section 1323(c.1)(1); and(ii) the application contains the required information indicating that the applicant is a qualified elector of the county.(10) Process a voter registration application in accordance with subsection (c) and update its registration if the commission finds during its examination under subsection (a) the following:(i) the application contains voter registration information transmitted under section 1323(c.1)(1);(ii) the applicant is currently a registered elector of the Commonwealth; and(iii) the application contains name or address information that differs from the information contained in the SURE system for the applicant.(c) Processing of voter registration.--(1) When a commission has [accepted] processed a voter registration application under subsection (b)(3) or (9), the commission shall assign each applicant a unique 20250HB1396PN1688 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 identification number in the SURE system. The commission shall mail a wallet-sized voter's identification card to the individual by first class nonforwardable mail, return postage guaranteed, which shall serve as notice of the acceptance of the application. The card shall contain all of the following:* * *(1.1) When a commission has processed a voter application under subsection (b)(9), the commission shall, by first class nonforwardable mail, return postage guaranteed, mail to the applicant a wallet-sized voter's identification card and a document that gives the applicant an opportunity to:(i) Decline voter registration.(ii) Affiliate with a political party.(2) When a commission has [accepted] processed a voter registration application under subsection [(b)(4), (5), (6), (7) or (8),](b)(7), (8) or (10) or has transferred a registration record under subsection (d), the commission shall mail a wallet-sized voter's identification card to the individual by first class nonforwardable mail, return postage guaranteed, which shall serve as notice of the acceptance of the application. The card shall contain all of the following:(i) Name and address of the individual.(ii) Name of municipality of residence.(iii) Identification of the individual's ward and district.(iv) The effective date of registration.(v) Designation of party enrollment and date of enrollment.(vi) A space for the individual's signature or mark.20250HB1396PN1688 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) The SURE registration number of the individual.(viii) A statement that the individual must notify the commission within ten days from the date it was mailed if any information on the card is incorrect; otherwise, the information shall be deemed correct for voter registration purposes.* * *(6) If an individual whose application was processed under subsection (b)(9) declines voter registration under subsection (c)(1.1)(i) within 21 days after the mailing of the card or if the individual's voter registration information transmitted under section 1323(c)(2) or (c.1)(1) was incorrect due to an error by the Department of Transportation, the commission shall cancel the individual's voter registration information from the SURE system, notify the individual by first class nonforwardable mail, return postage guaranteed of the cancellation and deem the individual to have never registered to vote or attempted to register to vote. The department may direct commissions to exclude certain applications containing voter registration information transmitted under section 1323(c)(2) or (c.1)(1) from the procedures in this section if an applicant is a program participant under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6703 (relating to Address Confidentiality Program).(d) Transfer of registration records.--(1) If, during application under section 1322 (relating to i n-person voter registration) , 1323 (relating to a pplication with driver's license application) , including a change of address under section 1323(c)(4)(ii), 1324 20250HB1396PN1688 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to a pplication by mail) or 1325 (relating to government agencies), an individual discloses that the individual is a registered elector of another county or is found to be registered in another county, the commission of the individual's new county of residence shall transfer the voter record from the commission of the individual's former county of residence, process the application under subsection (c)(2), and direct a [cancellation] notice of transfer to the commission of the individual's former county of residence in accordance with regulations promulgated under this part.(2) [Upon receipt of a notice transmitted in accordance with paragraph (1), the commission of the individual's former county of residence shall investigate. If the commission finds that the individual is a registered elector of the county, the commission shall verify the address change with the registered elector in accordance with this part. Upon verifying that the registered elector has moved to another county of residence, the commission shall cancel the registered elector's registration, transfer a copy of the canceled registration record to the commission of the registered elector's new county of residence and retain a record of the transfer. The commission of both counties shall promptly update information contained in their registration records.] (Reserved).* * *Section 19. Sections 1501, 1502 and 1503 of Title 25 are repealed:[§ 1501. Removal notices.(a) Form.--(1) A commission shall make removal notices available to 20250HB1396PN1688 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electors who are registered in the county.(2) The notice shall be printed upon cards suitable for mailing, addressed to the office of the commission. The notice shall provide the following information:(i) The address of present residence, including municipality.(ii) The address of last registration, including municipality.(iii) Date of removal to present residence.(iv) Signature.(3) The notice shall contain a statement that the registered elector may, by filling out properly and signing a removal notice and returning it to the office of the commission, secure the transfer of registration effective as to elections at least 30 days after the date of removal into the new district.(4) The notice shall contain a warning to the registered elector that the notice will not be accepted as an application for transfer of the elector's registration unless the signature thereon can be identified by the commission as the elector's signature as it appears on file with the commission.(5) The notice shall contain a warning to the registered elector that the notice must be received by the commission not later than 30 days before an election. If mailed, the notice must be postmarked not later than the deadline for registration or, in the case of an illegible or missing postmark, received within five days of the close of registration.(b) Use.--A registered elector who removes residence from 20250HB1396PN1688 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 one place to another within the same county must notify the commission by filing a removal notice under subsection (a) or a signed request for renewal that contains the information required in subsection (a) with the commission not later than the registration deadline before an election. If mailed, the notice or request must be postmarked not later than the deadline for registration or, in the case of an illegible or missing postmark, received within five days of the close of registration. The following apply:(1) An official registration application of an elector who has registered by mail qualifies as a removal notice.(2) A registered elector who removes residence from one place to another within the same county and who has not yet filed a removal notice with the commission shall be permitted to vote once at the elector's former polling place following removal if, at the time of signing the voter's certificate, the elector files with the judge of election a signed removal notice properly filled out. Removal notices under this paragraph shall be returned to the commission with the voting check list, and the commission shall proceed to transfer the registration of the elector under section 1502 (relating to transfer of registration) and shall promptly update information contained in its registration records. A registered elector may vote in the election district of the elector's former residence not more than one time following the elector's removal.(3) A registered elector who removes residence from one county to another county and who is not registered to vote in the new county of residence shall be permitted to vote in the election district in the former county of residence if, at 20250HB1396PN1688 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the time of signing the elector's certificate, the elector files with the judge of election a signed affirmation declaring the elector's new residence. A registered elector may vote in the election district of the elector's former residence not more than one time following the elector's removal. Affirmations made under this paragraph shall be returned to the commission of the elector's former county of residence with the voting checklist, and that commission shall proceed to transfer the registration of the elector under section 1502. Upon receipt of the transfer notice, the commission of the elector's new county of residence shall immediately process the transfer of the elector in accordance with section 1328 (relating to approval of registration applications). Both commissions shall promptly update information contained in their registration records.§ 1502. Transfer of registration.(a) General rule.--Upon timely receipt of notification of removal under section 1501(b) (relating to removal notices), the commission shall proceed as follows:(1) The signature on the notification document shall be compared with the signature of the registered elector as it appears on file with the commission.(2) If the signature appears authentic, the commission shall enter the change of residence on the registered elector's registration records.(3) If a request for transfer which is determined to be authentic under paragraph (2) shows a removal within the period of 30 days preceding an election, the commission, after such election, shall enter the change of residence on the registered elector's registration record. The commission 20250HB1396PN1688 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall advise the registered elector promptly in writing of its action.(4) When a registered elector has filed with a commission a notice that the elector has moved from the county to another county, if the signature appears authentic the commission shall enter the change of residence on the elector's registration records, cancel the registration of the elector and notify the commission of the elector's new county of residence to register the elector. Upon receipt of the transfer notice, the commission of the elector's new county of residence shall immediately process the transfer of the elector in accordance with section 1328 (relating to approval of registration applications).(5) If a request for transfer which is determined to be authentic under paragraph (4) shows a removal within the period of 30 days preceding an election, the commission, after such election, shall enter the change of residence on the elector's registration records, cancel the registration of the elector and notify the commission of the elector's new county of residence to register the elector. Upon receipt of the transfer notice, the commission of the elector's new county of residence shall immediately process the transfer of the elector in accordance with section 1328.(6) A commission shall promptly update information contained in its registration records.(b) Electors unable to write.--A registered elector who is unable to sign the notification document may affix a mark to the notification document. The mark must be affixed in the presence of a witness who must sign the notification document.§ 1503. Change of enrollment of political party.20250HB1396PN1688 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 By the deadline for registration, a registered elector who desires to change the enrollment of political designation or who, although registered, has not previously enrolled as a member of a party may appear before a commissioner, registrar or clerk or may submit an application by mail under section 1324 (relating to application by mail) and state in a signed writing the political party in which the registered elector desires to be enrolled. If the signature of the elector is verified by comparison with the registered elector's signature as it appears on file with the commission, the commissioner, registrar or clerk shall make the change in its registration records. If supported by other evidence of identity, a mark may be made in lieu of a signature by a registered elector who is unable to write. The mark must be made in the presence of a witness who must sign the registration application.]Section 20. Section 1505(a) and (b) of Title 25 are amended to read:§ 1505. Death of registrant.(a) Department of Health.--A commission shall cancel the registration of a registered elector or the preregistration of a preregistrant reported dead by the Department of Health. The Department of Health shall, within 60 days of receiving notice of the death of an individual [18] 16 years of age or older, send the name and address of residence of that individual to a commission in a manner and on a form prescribed by the department. The commission shall promptly update information contained in its registration records.(b) Other sources.--A commission may also utilize information obtained from the department through the department's membership with the Electronic Registration 20250HB1396PN1688 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Information Center or its successor, published newspaper obituaries, letters testamentary or letters of administration issued by the office of the registrar of wills to cancel and remove the registration of an elector, provided that such removals are uniform, nondiscriminatory and in compliance with the Voting Rights Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-110, 42 U.S.C. § 1973 et seq.). The commission shall promptly update information contained in its registration records.* * *Section 21. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following provisions shall take effect immediately:(i) The following amendments or additions to the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code:Article XI-C.Article XI-D.(ii) The following amendments or additions to 25 Pa.C.S.:Section 1222(c)(22).(iii) This section.(2) The following provisions shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later:(i) The following amendments or additions to the Pennsylvania Election Code:Section 102(z.7).Section 412.2(a).Article V heading.Subarticle (b.1) of Article V.Section 1210(a.4)(2), (5)(i), (ii) and (7) and 20250HB1396PN1688 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d).Section 1302.1(a).Section 1302.2(c).Section 1304.Section 1306.Section 1308(a), (b) and (g)(1)(ii), (1.1), (2), (4)(ii) and (iii) and (8).Section 1302-D(g).Section 1302.1-D(a).Section 1302.2-D(a)(3).Section 1304-D(a), (a.1) and (a.2).Section 1306-D(a) and (d).Section 1602-A(j)(1).(ii) The following amendments or additions to 25 Pa.C.S.:Section 1222(c)(23) and (24).Section 1301(a) and (a.1).Section 1325(a) introductory paragraph and (b)(4).Section 1505(a) and (b).(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20250HB1396PN1688 - 98 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122